Bottom line point after these a 140 words I have just written: I don’t want people at BSB to take this the wrong way. It’s a great school. I wasn’t saying anything bad about it. I was just comparing it in a rude, funny way to Montclair’s public schools. Sorry to bore you on confusions.
Offered by the Cohasset Recreation Department
After the parade came the Fireworks. Yes, we were super close to the castle, but didn’t want to stay THAT close. We made our way back and then realized our mistake. Main Street was PACKED. A Cast Member holding a light up in the air said, “If you want to watch the Fireworks, follow me…” so we kind of “crowd dove” through a ton of people and she led us to an open patch where no one was standing! Pretty crazy! We were also WAY closer so that Cast Member received a gold star in my opinion!!!
*** By healthier alternatives – I mean you are at the grocery store , your standing in the chip isle and it’s a game day decision – what do you buy? The Doritos or is there a healthier alternative?
Topping my list of favorites right now are the following:
That being said, if the dog is charging, do the following.
Good news is, I finally found the strength to write again. I’m also going to try to stop writing all these doom and gloom heavy handed pieces. Hot Food Porn and myself will try our hand this year at our own American Recovery and Reinvestment Act. The comedy in my life kind of died for a while. I think I summed it up best to my friend a while back, “this isn’t really me, I used to be funny and charismatic, and I used to know how to actually like people.”
Luckily, Isabel is eight, not a full-fledged teenager (*shudder*) and I was surprised to find that she brought a unique aspect to the story. I enjoyed reading about her and I liked Moore's slow transformation into a caring and loving father.
Kegel’s perineometer was the first biofeedback machine designed for clinical use. Employing a vaginal sensor, an air-pressure balloon, and a tire gauge, it enabled patients to verify that they were performing Kegel’s correctly and to monitor their progress.
It’s fragile.
Tentative plans call for new retaining walls and a relocated driveway, but would retain the existing lap pool and spa.
34 And when he was come in, he did eat and drink, and said, Go, see now this cursed woman, and bury her: for she is a king’s daughter.
Again, ladies,.. its a message. its supposed to be quick, like fast food,... in and out.
All Blog Content is Copyright 2012 of Nightshade Author of Thepurplebroom.wordpress.com unless otherwise stated
Me too.
JOYRadio is all about People Inspiring People,with host Pattie Wekel Hall interviewing people from all walks of life, sharing their life-stories, and hopefully inspiring others to create their own personal JOY.
Employee
Rejection – of course! I have an enormous box of rejection letters – and they are just the ones I didn't tear up or burn. But every now and then I got a bit of encouragement and that was enough to keep me going. Also, I think it helps that I was in the academic world for a long time, and had plenty of experience in getting grant proposals and journal articles turned down and criticised. So I should be thick-skinned by now...
No chores were done and I sat at my craft desk guilt free to work on Project Life when Travis was either in the wrap or napping. I indulged and watched Grey's Anatomy & Scandal while nursing Travis and holding him maybe a little too long so I could finish the episodes.
- As lip balm cools, there is a tendency for settling to occur, making for an uneven surface. Keep some melted balm set aside to ‘top off’ your tubes as they cool.
All in all, I did enjoy the book and looked forward to the rest. How does THAT idea play out? Pretty well, but you know, comic companies quite often go back to the same well too many times.
I jest, I moan and I guffaw in the mirror, but in truth it was fun, enlightening and painless. Well, aside from the eye poking, back stabbing and hair pulling of course.
Peter Laughner - Take The Guitar Player For A Ride - 1995
What’s playing on the XM or iPod right now? REALIZE by Colbie Caillat
That’s $107/hr as a couple or $53.50/hr per person. And to earn that much after taxes you’d really have to earn $612; money saved (by not having to spend it) is actually worth more than we realize when the government’s cut is taken into consideration.
Now that I've been talking about it - I think I need to run right out and get another one of these chocolate pies going.
I was attracted to this top simply because the design on it was so striking. I love the mix of colors. Once on, however, it was clear it wasn't going to work for me. I tried on the X-Small and it was HUGE! It swallowed me up. It doesn't look as bad in the pictures actually, just a bit baggy, but in real life, it was a train wreck. Sized out on this one. I will say although it was cute, it's no way $78 cute. Wait for sale and size down on this one.
I pick my toast up. I love toast. Mom. I love my toast. Mom. I love you toast. Mom. I eat my toast, ham and potatoes and then I get applesauce? I eat applesauce, swig milk and find piece for Al's bike in no time? Where my...my...my...my...my flashlight? It's a kid's flashlight. It's a toy flashlight. You find it for me? You find it for me? Mom. I go in ga'age and find piece for Al's bike in no time, right?! I love you toast, Mom.
Since starting Baclofen I am finding that I am much more able to just ‘be’ and live in the moment. I think that’s why I am much more productive now – at work and in personal time. Because I’m focusing on one task at a time, and not having ten things on the go simultaneously, I am getting through so much more.
Completely opposite the saison, this beer was awesome looking. Deep purple almost black and lovely stillness to it. They didn't say how long this was aged in the barrel but it was aged on black wishniak cherries (hence the name) during that time. Pretty sour nose but not as much vinegar as the Phruit Phunk. Started sour up front followed by a huge, sweet black cherry flavor. If you've ever had a black cherry soda, then you have an idea how this one finished. Just tons of black cherry flavor which grew as I drank more. Really great. This was Jo's favorite of the event I believe.
2. Add the onion and cook until softened, about 5-6 minutes.
6 May 1763 – Williamson Plant was born
I always suspected the "altruistic hamster" thing was an act
For the "hatching" eggs, I dipped the bottom third of the cake pop in white and then added a stick to the base.
NATO violated international law on numerous occasions during the campaign. The UN Security Council's permission is needed to launch miltary action. It was not even requested. The bombing also broke NATO Treaty Article 5, which states that force can only be used in self-defence. Again - where is the trial being held for this?
Mary S and Wendy
Primrose SAPS officer charged after pointing weapon at driver over parking lot dispute,
***Indian Red was renamed Chestnut in 1999 in response to educators who felt some children wrongly perceived the crayon color was intended to represent the skin color of Native Americans. The name originated from a reddish-brown pigment found near India commonly used in fine artist oil paint.
My dad and I have always been very close. That's what comes from being the youngest of 5, 4 years younger than my brother, and wait for it... the only girl.
And in our stressful and chaotic times, I suspect there are more people who are likely to 'snap', and how can we protect against such behaviors? Can we lock people up pre-emptively? We no longer commit people who are mentally disturbed; thanks to liberal policies, we ended involuntary commitment, so we are compelled to wait until someone has acted out to be able to confine them. Then it is too late, in many cases.
After his speech, the minister of sport Fikile Mbalula, also attacked the ANC in a fiery speech and said that the ANC youth league was “AN AUTONOMOUS AND MILITANT organisation. The mother-body should not try to change that, they will never be able to do that.”
First off, many apologies for the length of time since my last post… so much has transpired between this morning & January 5 when I put in my last post, and I am going to have to concise with what I write as I could go on all day! I am using a free open Wi-fi network in the flat, and am having to write this early in the morning in order to get a strong enough signal.
Once these tears dry up, I will moistly remember my love
In South Africa, today, being white means to cross the T's and dot the I's of political correctness, to silently assume the role of the historically guilty and to never question or criticize the new establishment's intentions. Ranging from board meetings to retail store queues, you have to pretend that you subscribe to the new 'moral' order. The notion is that whites have never suffered and that they cannot be victims. Instead, whites are commonly portrayed as the authors of suffering and hardship. This politically correct dogma has turned into an unprecedented form of Orwellian Thought Policing, not even experienced under apartheid.
In addition to the fascinating array of housing, Tremont is also known for its art galleries and restaurants. Two notable restaurants are Lolita of Food Network Iron Chef Michael Symon fame and Fahrenheit, presided over by Chef Rocco Whalen.
that's most of the craftiness for now.
Prime time: Friday and Saturday nights
“Speculative Realism”
These disturbing PSA ads by Juvenile Protective Association visually illustrate that “Verbal abuse is still abuse.” And unlike physical abuse which leaves visible marks on the outside, you are leaving wounds with your words that may take a young kid a lifetime to heal. These ads were created by EuroRSCG Chicago, USA.
This morning i toddled off to post the backrounds off....all in all we had 18 fabulous techniques and i hope it inspires you to do some creating , i know i cant wait to try a few....
I am honored to be a part of flourishes and share with you the new Pretty in Pink 1 2 3 kit for this months new release. This is a picture showcasing everything included in the kit. Please note the picture only shows 1 of the Maya Roads stick pins, you will actually receive 12, it also only shows 1 of each of the papers in the paper pack, however you will receive the entire 6x6 Glitz Pretty in Pink paper pack. The ribbon and trim consists of at least 1 yard of each of the ones pictured.
Pat is a coach that will be missed and I do not think that there is any coach that can replace her. I know that staff is going to miss her being head coach even though, Pat is still going to contribute to the team. The players now have to just be thankful that they were able to play in the presence of true greatness in Pat Summitt.
By Chloe Beynon
“Did your special friend have a name, Tom?”
After I had moved on, blogging became a fun way to just "be". I'd made friends with so many of you. It just made sense to keep going.
Chase's Breakfast Burritos
Pogo Radio – Are They Any Good?
If you do your job creating a fabulous appetizer in Chapter One and follow it up well, your readers will not only stay through the whole meal, they’ll order dessert, coffee and maybe even a nightcap—and they won’t want to leave until you have to throw them out at closing time.
A politician accidently tweeting a picture of his weiner, with a last name of Weiner.. really??
I hope everyone is enjoying a relaxing weekend. Yesterday, I did not leave my bed unless absolutely necessary, and caught up on much needed rest, blog reading, and chick movies. It was great, but now my work week starts again. Today I'm getting All Star Weekend ready to walk the red carpet of the Teen Choice awards. I adore these boys, and can't wait to see them, but I'm really hoping to get back to my bed asap! Now if I was actually going to the award show, and could catch a glimpse of the yummy Robert Pattinson, I would care less about bed! And yes...I'm fourteen. :)
This was my design inspiration: If you have ever been to Australia you might have noticed all the beautiful gum trees that abound in this part of the world. Gum trees are part of the classic Australian landscape. I made this texture using images of gum trees, gum tree leaves and bark.
"I thought somebody had bought Europe with my credit card," said Josh Muszynski, from New Hampshire.
Isn't my little Leprechaun the cutest ever?
But at least I can experience it.
2. The streets are full of water and they don’t have a car/boat to get to school. I wish that my internet speed allowed for photo uploads, because I have a great picture of Rio (or Avenida) España during a rainstorm.
This also raises another question, will macro beers slowly evolve into malt liquor novelty beverage manufacturers? Can a Fluffed Marshmallow Flavored Coors be far behind?
Far from the menace suggested by Allan Stratton's title, The Grave Robber's Apprentice is merely the occupation which an infant boy, retrieved from a jewelled chest awash on the shore, is anticipated to fill by his rescuer, Knobbe, a grave robber. After twelve years, Hans knows very little about himself, except that he does not want to be a grave robber. On the other hand, Angela, the twelve-year-old daughter of the Count and Countess von Schwanenberg knows that she wants to write and perform her marionette plays in all the courts of Europe. But, when Archduke Arnulf decides that Angela will become his next archduchess upon her thirteenth birthday, their lives take an unexpected turn.
I finished the manuscript I was working on before Doomsday, but I didn’t get published. I have the pile of rejection letters to prove it. A quite impressive pile of rejection letters, I must say. Enough to wallpaper several bathrooms.
Avoid soiling your trousers by not pulling apart your buttocks when you think you are about to fart.
First of all I apologize for the lack of a post. I have been so busy preparing myself for my big move in 2 weeks to New York! I am excited to say I have found my perfect little place in the West Village!
I am here to show you a new layout and to announce the winner of my Christmas giveaway from last week :)
I bet 25 years ago, on this same day, my father was wandering around his house like I am today feeling sick as a dog, worse than I no doubt, just looking for some relief or distraction from this disease. My wedding was only one week later in that same house.
Springsteen often talks of a conversation he’s having with the fans. He repeatedly says he wants to continue that conversation—through recorded and live music. It’s more than a conversation. The editor of this collection gets it right: “In a very real sense, Springsteen’s body of work can also be viewed that way, as an ongoing exploration, via popular song, of the very heart of the American psyche.”
They tried to mend me there.
People always ask why I love Social Media so much and I always say: “The likes of Facebook and Twitter have given people a voice! The biggest hurdle is helping them understand that with that voice comes responsibility – when voicing your opinion to a friend or brand remember there’s a person behind that profile! A living, breathing person that deserves respect not some robot… “
Helps with diabetic neuropathy of the extremities and gastrointestinal tract
There are two factors. First, the end of communism in the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe, and the loss of faith in communism elsewhere, particularly China. Atheists and non-religious people are overwhelmingly concentrated in communist countries. About two thirds of the world's atheist population is in China.
Wayne Terrial Davis, 29, Fort Meade, Md.
Thanks for the "spurr'd" gloss, Anne. But how big is the dude's penis? Teh Lady Readers need to know!
I feel the early morning chill.
This morning, second period, with my principal in the room, I had each student and my principal write their name on a piece of paper. I turned the pieces upside down, shuffled them and then set them aside for a moment. Then, I told my students a few true stories. I told them stories of how I had come to find respect and trust in our learning space. I thanked my principal and asked her to step out. Then, slowly, with honesty and love, I drew one piece of paper at a time. Slow, as I read each name in turn, I thanked each student for the gifts they have offered me over the last 9 weeks. We cried. And we spent the rest of the day laughing, awash in tears, gratitude and reflection.
2) The New Pornographers- Together
My heart afflicted by disease,
Vit B12 – Maintain general health
37. Previously he was a trainee at JYPE, but in 2008 he moved to the SME as a trainee exchange
John drove for many hours while I ate Advil and slept. He’s the man! We arrived in Charlotte around 9:30. This time passing through we stayed with my cousin Mike, his lovely wife Jenn, and their 3 boys. They have the most beautiful house in the world. I mean it. Every room could be on Pinterest. The boys’ rooms look like they are straight out of a Pottery Barn catalogue. Everything is beautiful and inviting and comfortable and spotless and I don’t know how Jenn does it! In the car the next day, as we drove back to Pennsylvania, John and I were both lamenting that our house definitely needs some sprucing up after seeing Mike and Jenn’s house. We started making a list of things we should improve; dirty, stained carpet, gouged linoleum floor, broken doorbell, master bath with half 80’s brassy gold fixtures, half newer brushed nickel fixtures, etc. The list seemed to stretch on and on until finally John sighed and said, “We should have stayed at a Motel 6 and then we would feel like our house was a palace!! So true, so true. But then we drove through Bland and felt better about ourselves.
one together for it is always the one thing we push out
I woke up, felt great, and went to the market just outside my door to do my shopping for the next few days. I love going to the market on Friday mornings. Waking up to a bunch of smiling faces, anxious to take your cash in exchange for fresh herbs can never be a bad thing!
Sadako: "They're not even ready for Frankie Valli at this point--if they can't handle a little white guy singing falsetto, they won't be able to wrap their minds around a little white guy playing heavy metal."
it's from a different source with full intro and
The other cards that we were very impressed with and thought deserved an honorable mention are:
In 1950, Detroit was known to the World as the “Paris of the West.” Boasting a thriving economy and a population of more than 2 million people (80 percent of whom were white), the sky seemed the only limit for this city on the move.
Even the winter won't last forever...
Brewed: 09-16-2006
The culturing of meditation into our system is normal. Some people call it the higher state of consciousness, I call it the normal state of consciousness since we are endowed with the ability to live in that state. Meditation helps in two ways-it prevents stress from getting into the system and simultaneously helps release already accumulated stress. Regular meditation also leads to happiness and fulfillment; to sensitisation of the sensory organs (thereby intensifying the experiences of seeing, tasting, feeling, etc.); and to greater intuitiveness.
1900: 1054.9 OG
Get torn apart and tortured
Some of the women are shy. They don't want to talk or have their photo taken. A couple others want me to teach them photography. We sit around the long tables while they eat their lunches and they talk about finishing school, finding new homes, getting jobs.
What he did not manage to do, at least not for me, is to convey a clearer picture of George Washington as a person. Yes, his character, his habits (apparently, he was very fastidious with his clothes), his looks and his way of dealing with problems are thoroughly described, as are the military campaigns and political events he was part of. But if I had to sum up in one word what I feel is lacking here, that word would have to be "atmosphere".
They are both very different short story collections. Possibly couldn't be any different. Blue Has No South is a collection of 115 short fictions, that I would variously describe as fables, puzzles, poems, true stories, warnings, dreams, histories, myths, found stories. They are brief, intense, distilled, and this is probably a book I will dip into many times again. Hot Kitchen Snow is more traditional, in the sense that it contains the kind of short stories we might expect when we say short stories. It was a bit of a slow burner for me, but left me thinking wow...
Very cynical move. A child will cost FAR MUCH MORE than $100 from the basic necessities needed from age 0 to 1 alone. This is a very cynical and calculative consumerist you have as CM. This is typical influence from PAP and a mockery of new parents.Taking from the taxpayers to indulge DAP’s ego if anything. Who was consulted in the giveaway? Institutionalized bribery rather than improvements to the system itself that should be instead of grandstanding at the taxpayer’s expense :
My Grandma always made these for Christmas. I didn't like mushrooms, but I always LOVED these! While Grandma slaved over the stove for hours... I've simplified this recipe and now it only takes minutes.
Not so taken by the latest Molly Hatchett album ‘Justice’ (SPV) which sounds just like their other albums and for me lacks any killer songs. That said it you like the band you’ll want this one.
If your high school and wanted some great new portraits – contact me for a great 2010 High School price!!!
that can be easily adapted to a growing child.
I don’t have a favorite Genre, I just like anything that is unique or seems good to me!
THANK YOU!!!
These things are sometimes so intensely private and personal that outside witnesses are more intruder than observer. In fact, I know some artists who proclaim they are not even curious what anyone else thinks. Their interest extends only as far as the creative vision itself. This art is not trying to engage an audience. The truth is, creative types are often simply interested in what their imagination provides or reveals, and decidedly not always in how it gets received. Sometimes our art is so internally focused that it is at most a private conversation, and an audience is only dropping eves and in butting where they are not wanted.
Water was collected from all over the world. Some of the water that was collected from the various bodies of water are the Tokyo Bay (Japan), Yukon River (Alaska), Dragon Bay Lake (Beijing), Dalyan River (Turkey), Aplen Snow Melted (Germany), River Ghanga (India), Straight of Megellan (South America), and Moskava River (Russia). A total of around 42 Great Waters from around the world.
so as you all can see, I am going to be completely rushed off my feet for the forseeable future. I literally haven’t had GENUINELY this little to do since I finished my A levels over ten years ago, I don’t like it. And even then I had a part time job (if you can call slave labour in an opticians dungeon a job).
The median age among California's whites is 44, while the median age for the Hispanic population is 28, according to the study.
--Jars of Clay
In closing, for those seeking quests for 'older' and more 'mature' audiences, one of my favorite quests was Monty Python's Monty Python and the Holy Grail. Here is a brilliant excerpt I hope you enjoy (the quality of the YouTube clip isn't great, but it is good enough and well worth the view):
She sensed the wolf laying beside her.
Friedman wrote: Under the limited standard for SEQRA review, the court is constrained to hold that ESDC’s elaboration of its reasons for using the 10 year build-out and for not requiring an SEIS was not irrational as a matter of law. ESDC's continuing use of the 10 year build-out was supported—albeit, in this court’s opinion, only minimally—by the factors articulated by ESDC. ESDC did not, for reasons that are unexplained to this date, expressly state, in the documentation prepared in connection with its review of the 2009 plan, that the MTA agreement permitted FCRC to defer acquisition until 2030 of air rights necessary to complete construction of various buildings called for in Phase II of the Project. Contrary to petitioners’ contention, however, the documentation of ESDC’s review unquestionably demonstrates, as found above, that ESDC categorized the MTA agreement as a “major change” to the Project… and was aware of the MTA installment through 2030.
If you do not wish to post the announcement, send the $5 via paypal to goodnightmommyboutique@gmail.com with your email address and Baby Shower April Event in subject line or notes portion of the form.
nellie snellen - centre cut
I’d love to hear your stories of the office brown noser. We all have one, know one, might even be friends with one. Sound off and tell me what bugs you the most about your office suck up.
Double Knitting
Bracelet: Lia Sophia
I am ever grateful for my friends who are helping and encouraging me to let my light shine.
each day the last day.
Soon there will be leaves on the trees and people at the beaches. Soon!
This is what I did to the hearth of the fireplace. I still have to do the mantle yet!
We’ve all heard the jokes about people who drink boxed wine and maybe you even took part in such stereotypical behavior. Well, let’s be fair…boxed wine does seem to have a stigma attached to it. There are great advantages, though:
If you're a regular blog reader, I bet you've already seen several reviews of HotPants. I have been reading the other reviewers' reports to see if their experiences paralleled mine, and they pretty much did.
Happy Birthday Card:
Stunning new reports reveal that Coalition Frontbencher Christopher Pyne spent almost two hours drinking and “shooting the breeze” with James Ashby in a late night alcohol- fuelled drinking session.
We are so thankful for everyone who has pitched in to help out or donate!
5 Resources to Help You Write SEO Friendly Blog Posts by Carrie Mumford. This is an awesome opening resource for those looking for ways to expand their site visibility.
Howdy all- Don't forget that there are only 4 more days left to eter the SPRING FLING CHALLENGE!
1 - Ore-Ida bag shredded hash brown potatoes
Inside this little owl storage pouch is a handy lightweight tote bag, which you can clip onto your handbag or keys. Such a handy gift to have around. Thank you so much Jan.
My reflection in his vision is too perfect for reality.
LT: Who said that?
Here lie the reasons for the book's success. For all his apparent faults, Stephen is a totally convincing and thoroughly engaging character. You can't help empathising with him. Having a terrible secret which you feel sets you apart and that can be told to no-one is a normal condition of adolescence, although in most people's experience it's something less alarming than a predatory pet big enough to eat your own father. It's impossible not to admire Stephen's determination and resourcefulness, and the clues are there right from the beginning to his good heart: from his affection for his little brother, through his care for his foster sister's paralytically drunk boy friend, to the fact that he never considered leaving the young crocodile to die when it would have been so much easier to do so.
Beware the Jubjub bird, and shun
I cried so hard I couldn’t breathe,
Ring in the New Year with a fresh and funny tale about dating, relationships and life as Anna Faris (Scary Movie Franchise, The House Bunny) and Chris Evans (Fantastic Four, Captain America) come together in a hilarious quest for "the one" in WHAT’S YOUR NUMBER? Unrated Ex-tended Cut, debuting on Blu-ray and DVD January 10 from Twentieth Century Fox Home Entertainment.
Our young guest speaker, Andy Holden, told us how the educational system indoctrinated youngsters into multiculturalism. He spoke of Hollywood's 'one world, one people' outlook. But he asked us to consider White architecture; we brought order to the world. Andy spoke of the strong Jewish nationalism; of terrorised anthropologists; how Hollywood films ignore communism and the 20 million killed in Russia; how his school tried to tie in the Holocaust with the BNP, a slander Andy never understood. He asked why we should think of South Africa's racial groups but not our own; questioned the natural instincts of last year's rioters. Andy. a Leicester-born lad, warned that we are a minority in the city, but noted that the British come off best when we are outnumbered.
Adenan Satem’s appointment as ‘special functions’ minister has a double motive.
We had a great time, drank a lot of outstanding beer and we met so many people who shared our vision of what great beer can do for our culture.
Weeeeeee Doggies!
And I have the firm belief in this now,
Japan’s psych heroes Acid Mothers Temple & The Cosmic Inferno make the sun come up in the West with a long, gorgeous take on “Eyes of the World”
Tremeloes Even the bad times are good UK
She gasped and pulled back from his hot breath curling around her ear. She met his gaze. At once excited and shocked. This was their first meeting. On top of that he was her first real experience with a Dom man. She had expected to have a drink and talk. She expected that mutual decisions would be made about whether or not they continued. She had followed instructions and not worn panties. She had not expected to have to undertake futher instruction to cum, in public. She felt acutely her naivety. She knew at once she would comply. She was the most excited she had been in a long time. She felt the gush between her thighs. As she rose he said, "...and I will smell you when you return. Go quickly now."
Allison: “You said I was perfect.”
What about you? Have you exhibited signs of ProG? Beware, my friends…if you have a brain you’re at risk! You may have a full-blown case of ProG, or you may be a carrier…or both. When genetic testing for this new discovery becomes available, I’ll let you know right away…right after I sing a song…
Overall Height: 7"
Oh, and on another note, my youngest daughter Chloe was named "Student of the Month" for 'caring'. Chloe has been a tad jealous of her sister Pearl who was named "Student of the Month" in both KG and 1st grade. She has been hoping every month since that it would be her turn. I was a little bit concerned that she might not achieve this status because she can be a bit difficult. Now, finally her dream has become a reality. Not only did Chloe earn this wonderful honor, but her best friend, who is in another class, won the very same honor. I thought it was pretty cool that two best friends both won "Student of the Month" for the same thing at the exact same time!
will you leave here as a Christian or a non Christian? will you resist the grace of God? will you reject the love of Jesus? will you reject his invitation? or will you accept His grace by turning from sin and trusting in Him?
I am sure that they would have “resolved” the issue according to them. I am stuck with lousy network services which will be blamed on my SIM card making me wonder why I ever got a phone like this (which by the way is a pleasure to use!!)
in themselves the due penalty for their error.
These images were actually featured in several magazines, but Entertainment Weekly was nice enough to release them with out the words. Water For Elephants hits theaters on April 22!
Endure played
My students did a nice job on their own lapbooks. I would say that the only problem with using large pieces of construction paper instead of a file folder is the glue. Construction paper soaks up glue and things are never quite even. Believe it or not, 4th graders STILL don't know how to use bottled glue!!!!! They glued their fingers together, paper to desks, etc. Some of them put so much glue that it soaked through the paper and stuck the paper to the desk!!! Arrgghh!! I think that is what I may change...GLUE STICKS!
The movie shoot, filmed on the Kennish property, looks pretty nifty for something thrown together in a week. Regina seems a little taken aback by the money being spent, with props, make-up, wind, and smoke machines. Daphne is also a little reserved, but it’s clear she’s noticing little things around the house that reflect the childhood she didn’t have, such as Bay and Toby’s handprints in a garden stone. Filming is set to begin, but Toby can’t figure out how to work the borrowed (from Simone/Buckner) video equipment, so Simone is brought in to shoot the movie. Emmett and Simone play off barely knowing each other, but he texts her to leave (since she doesn’t know sign). I wonder when the two exchanged phone numbers and why they programmed each other in their cells since they’re “not supposed to know each other”?
“Everyone was asking me about them,” Lindsay said. “They said they couldn’t find a paper anywhere. That’s good, right?”
Yet none of them married Yugoslavs. My grandmother married a Jew. So did her sister. And here's where it gets strange. My grandparents never told my dad and my uncle about their Jewish relatives.
I owe my readers an apology (not just for the Rebecca Black quote). I took Easter Monday off from writing the blog, and instead enjoyed a fantastic dinner with my family and friends. But that does not excuse me for what happened next. I also took Thursday off, and in doing so broke an important blog rule: stick to your schedule.
Stare out window!
i.e. because I shouldn't have spent a penny!
But it can be revealed that a golden opportunity to smash the ring was missed nearly four years ago after a 15-year-old girl told police she had been raped in 2008.
If you choose this way, you will probably get the confused or nasty looks from other parents, the ones who are trying win as many battles as possible. They may call you crazy or weak. They may list for you all the ways in which they are winning. These parents have no idea what they are losing.
And as cliche and over-used as the analogy is, the tallest buildings have the deepest, most grueling-to-lay foundations.
historian’s
4 hard-boiled eggs, roughly chopped
there is the knowledge that no one else has a sock exactly like it
It's time to start walkin' down that Yellow Brick Road!
If you know there will be times such as Vacations, holidays, special events (weddings, business trips, family reunions etc…) where you will not be able to get to your normal facility, is there a back-up plan. Is there a facility where you are going that you can use or do you need to bring something in place of going somewhere.
No mention of Xmas can go without looking at the beer gift sets. I’m in two minds about these. More often than not it’s an attempt to flog you one or two overpriced bottles of piss, with a glass thrown in that you could easily nick from a boozer. However there are people in this world that don’t like to nick things from boozers, so this is one way to acquire the branded glassware that puts the icing on the Xmas cake of cooking lager appreciation. And if you get one, it is better than socks.
Obsessive Compulsive Disorder (OCD) is a mental illness that primarily revolves around anxiety and coping mechanisms that the individual has developed in order to handle that anxiety. Many people have OCD, but it can be hard to understand. The following links provide information and resources regarding this disorder.
I do use the Tri Rex Rulers for the blocks with the point in them.
My first alma mater had a bookmark contest with the theme 'migration'. I was only able to do this at the last minute but, as simple as it is, I had fun with it.
angekkok n; Inuit sorcerer or shaman. Perfect and sumptuous word for a fantasy author—I shall use it at the first opportunity. (Chambers 20th Century Dictionary says 'Eskimo' but I prefer Inuit myself. They need to amend this—actually they probably have. After all, I am working from the last millenium’s version).
RDX, the most lethal and unstable material, was to be placed inside 55-gallon drums in webbing and the drums then were to be filled with a gel substance. The explosives were to be shipped East, to Dulles Airport, marked as ”industrial solvent,” on the first available passenger flights, Mulcahy recalls. Once at Dulles, they were consolidated into one shipping container, along with the timers and the industrial tools and workbenches needed to set up the explosives laboratory in Libya. Then they were forwarded to Europe for transshipment by Lufthansa passenger planes to Tripoli without knowledge of the airline. All of the men involved in the meeting in Washington understood the implications of what they were doing, Mulcahy says: ”The nitro could have blown if the plane hit an air pocket.”
3. Change In Louise
Markers: Green Galore, Yoyo Yellow, Close to Cocoa, Blush Blossom and Basic Black
Oozy, self saucing, creamy, rich, complex, pungent umami. Yummy. A perfect “thank you mom” breakfast.
There are several vintage space rocket banks for sale all the time on eBay. Mostly metal, with a spring action that shoots the coin into the rocket-shaped bank. But I saw this, and once again, not exactly my usual thing, but I had to have it. Folks usually bid on the metal action banks, so this was very inexpensive. Not too "young" looking, is it? Well, I don't think so (I'm trying to keep the space room a bit "older" looking, which means passing up some cute spaceman nursery cutouts for the wall and such). 1960's - 1970's spaceman rocket coin bank.
No enough savings for you?
Happily, I'm on the mend now and with a proper desk and fancy chair installed in my own office in our new house ( courtesy of my parents, bless them ), I finally have everything I need to work as a professional author. I can't wait to get stuck back into my work, as CONTINUUM was progressing really well before disaster struck!
Even the volcano came out to celebrate! It was clear viewing all day – what a wedding gift from Mother Nature!
for Allah sake,it's really teach me a lot.
Flower punch is by Martha Stewart
Thomas Wyndesore
I invite you to be in prayer for the Vision Team as they do this important work that, if done right, will ensure that Northway is carrying out the vision God has called us to do.
This step takes a little bit of patience but it certainly pays off.
Given this unseemly state of affairs some believe we are on the precipice of “Pharmageddon” where medicine produces more ill health than health and where medical progress does more harm than good. This process has also been described by Dr. Rima Laibow as “Nutricide”:
(Moving down one spot) Tied for 3.) Song of the South - Despite the controversy and not officially being enjoyed in theaters or on home video/DVD/Blu-ray in the last 20 to 25 years, the Walt Disney Studios once proudly recognized this 1946 classic as one of the crowning jewels in the Walt Disney film crown. Based on the ‘Uncle Remus’ stories by Joel Chandler Harris, Walt Disney had wanted to make a film based on Harris’ work for a long time before finally bring his version to the big screen in the mid-1940′s. Set in the post-Civil War South, many took issue with the films portrayal of African-Americans when the film first came out. 25 or so years ago, the Disney Company finally succumbed to the criticism and have not released the film in any home entertainment format in the US or re-released the film in theaters since 1986. They have however released segments from the film on VHS and DVD in various sing-along-song releases and other compilation features, released the more popular songs (Zip-A-Dee-Do-Da, Everybody’s Got a Laughing Place) on compilation CD’s, and based a very popular theme park attraction (Splash Mountain) on the film. Without question, no unreleased Disney film has been more requested then Song of the South, being asked for each and every Disney shareholders meeting of the last several years (with a break to that tradition in 2012), inspiring fan campaigns, and generating tons of chatter on the internet, all in the hope that Disney may finally release this long over due classic to DVD and/ or Blu-ray.
“I can’t remember,” Obadiah pleaded with the voices. “Please, you are hurting me,” he begged.
Without further ado -
Declare the power of the blood of Jesus Christ…Resist the devil… Jesus wants people to be well.
Stronghart, McMullen's
If you are interested in inspiring articles about diverse spiritual topics such as angels, ascension, crystals & 2012, & lots lots more, check out my newsletter “Awakening Spirit.” You can view a sample by clicking here (it will open in a new window). If you subscribe to my mailing list, I will also send you my angel messages, offers and updates. To subscribe, click the ‘Subscribe to List’ box on the top left of the newletter (see link above).
The Daily Catch is a small restaurant located on Hanover Street in the North End (Little Italy) of Boston, MA. Lines of people are usually seen outside the restaurant, but I was lucky to beat that line when I went there around 7PM during my spring break.
Get the Entire 400,000 Article Package for the Special Price of only.
But probably not.
"That was when one of the suspects pulled out a gun and held the men up," he said.
If you know champagne is French, you may be farther ahead than you realize. The rest is a simple matter of getting educated. Quickly. So, let's take you back in time to just before Thanksgiving 2011 -- like today, maybe. Sit up straight and pay attention.
Etegami ~ a simple postcard size drawing (with or without color as I see it) with words often evoking season.
I have to confess that since we FINALLY got summer here in Portland, I am just NOT ready to celebrate Autumn, so my card uses autumn colors and I kinda left it at that -LOL!
By conveniently omitting his own role in concealing the notes from the court in 2006, McCombes avoids the same question being asked of him. If he knew about this “vital evidence” why then did he not disclose it to anyone at the time? Why wait until the trial was over?
3. Every Christian who walks in the sins of the spirit such as: jealousy, pride, murmuring, and a critical spirit, while condemning people outside the church for their sins of the flesh (Gal. 5:22-26).
When her turn came, she approached Sister Thandi and paid for six 400g tins of Nan Pelargon.
images. You will be creating images with our new sets that are released
I carefully waddled across the pool deck, looking up and trying to avoid, well, people, in expectation of stares. I glided into the pool. Scratch that. I plunked into the pool. Everything is lighter in the water....this is what I relished a couple of months ago as I swam up and down the length of the pool. How nice to feel almost normal. But today, today I was keenly aware of a much greater displacement of pool water once I heaved myself in. There was a lady walking with water weights in the lane next to me, and I wonder if my wake threw her off just a little.
Incredibly, most of the original structures on the grounds were in continuous use from 1805 to the 1970s, including the slave quarters, which later served as housing for temporary laborers. Made from cypress wood, which doesn’t rot or warp and resists termites, the buildings have good reason to last a long time. The main house was also built without a single nail. (Cue “Ooooh ahhhh” from tour group)
Bliss, I was able to walk the dog and drive my car without fearing for my safety on Saturday and on Sunday...Monday was also a good day - up to a point. It was bitingly cold but the forecast said there was only a 20% of us getting snow...
Death toll from tornadoes and storms in Mississippi has reached at least 32, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency said.
Apologies, have just sat here for a LOOOOOONG time trying to think of something. I could write 3,333 things that I don't love about myself but this is meant to be a happy post with cherries!
Is now unlocking in memory
I hope you are having a terrific week so far.
Commentator Comments :
08/24/210 SELL 0.01 xauusd 1227.48
Q. Any future things planned?
Watching Alam on a hot March afternoon is a lesson in how the UID platform is fraught with uncertainties and shortcomings. The biggest problem is connectivity. There are two towers directly across the road from the Pragya Kendra in Tigara panchayat and a third is being erected in the vicinity. Yet, Alam is forced to make a round of the Kendra and finally move out towards the anganwadi before he is able to make contact with his bank server. “Connectivity is at the heart of this system. If the GPRS link works everything goes well; otherwise this micro-ATM is as good as dead.”
not because i placed it on my tongue and tasted your earlobe
These boys seem to be all boy, despite my best efforts. Sure, we bake and sew and color and I try as hard as I possibly can to include them in the things I love to do...
The shuttle goes right pass us the first time and when he finally got to us, he was mad at us because we wasn’t where they told us to be. We stood where all the shuttles were to pick up people. It took 45 minutes to drive from the airport to the hotel when it should have only taken no more than 20. We get there, the place looked old and run down. They didn’t keep the pool clean and it was full of leaves. They closed down one part of the hotel because the balcony had ended and was under construction. Then guest services told us we had to pay a different price than what we agreed as a down payment. I thought the room was going to get better, it didn’t.
As this blog is designed to keep me on track and honest, I’ve decided to list the Current Five Projects of Doom, so that I can refer to them in shorthand and you can hold me accountable for their progress. Some are externally driven, which is a good thing, but most are internal which means that I am the only person accountable for their completion.
Aged Ivory
On a completely different topic. How long should I wait for my wool from the states to arrive before I start to stress that its not coming? I ordered 10th April . . . I have been checking the post box hopefully since a week later, obviously a bit enthusiastic of me. Its been a month .. now I'm starting to get worried. Have customs taken it? Did someone nick it out of my mailbox? Did it ever get posted? Am I being paranoid? How long does your wool take to arrive? Do you wait patiently, or impatiently like me!
In writing about this I’m made painfully aware of the parallels to disagreements ways to write about and support sex worker advocacy. The emotionally-charged nature of the issue is similar. The need felt by those with greater privilege to help those with less is similar. The risk of running over community-based initiatives without noticing is similar. The potential for us/them divides among people who would otherwise be allies is similar.
Anyway... on with the freebie. It is 6 "what am I" poems and a recording sheet for students to write their guesses and support them with proof from each poem. I did it as a "Scoot" type activity where I put the kids into 6 groups, each group went to a poem, read the poem, wrote their guess/proof, and then "scooted" to the next poem on my signal. It was fun and interesting for me to see the difference in the thinking between the three grade levels! My K kiddos didn't quite get the "proof" thing, but the 1st and 2nd graders did well on that! Not having taught K before, being with the three littles that are in my intervention group has been fun!
When I think of worshipping idols, I think of a Buddha or something of the sorts. A non living symbol that you believe in and worship. Although, that is one type of idol, there are many idols that we don’t think of very often. The verse below describes a different type of idol that hits closer to home.
The roof of our market stand came from discarded galvanized roofing lying amongst a Scotch Broom plantation on the property. Almost completely overgrown near the roofing is an enormous coil of 1/2" steel cable. Not that I need another enormous coil of that. Just sayin'.
(that is, lose themselves)
It was one of those simple, perceptive questions that require a series of verbal gymnastics to answer in a way that is satisfactory to both parent and child. The full answer is that an equine ambulance doesn’t have lights or sirens because if a racehorse is so badly injured that it would need to be rushed to a hospital, it is usually put down – i.e. killed - right there at the track. But how do you explain to a four-year old that horses aren’t cared for in the same way as humans? We opted not to and instead decided that this ambulance was for getting a horse off the track and that a second ambulance – one with lights and sirens – would be used to take a horse to the necessary medical facility. Pip seemed satisfied with that.
"Christmas Crown!"
Many of us think of name brands such as Microsoft or Apple Macintosh, when we think of owning a PC, but it all starts with the humble computer tower, where motherboards nurse their internal hardware to external peripherals. Manufacturers build the parts, and companies such as IBM, Acer and Dell put them together to make your "name-brand" PC - complete with trademark software (most likely Microsoft).
Add salt and pepper to taste
So, we get past the jokes and we do small talk for a few minutes. The dude then admits that he was a good krumper and can show me the moves, right on the train. I get way too excited over this, because I love love love hip hop dance and admire any of those bitches who do it and do it well. He’s a recreational krumper. Then instead of krumping, he continues chatting. So I say,”Uh, are you gonna get your krump on or what?”
250kg tyre flips – 2, 3, 5
Look for that post coming soon.
I recently had an encounter with what I believe is the world's angriest woman. It was super fun....
This blog will be about the things that i like and do not like i will review things like games videos music and famous people hope you like it
Comparing the new machine to the BBC Micro computer that had been released the previous December, Sinclair said: “It’s obvious at a glance that the design of the Spectrum is more elegant. What may not be so obvious is that it also provides more power”
So what is the LEED-PAC? Is it what it seems? Why have its listed proponents and financial backers ‘flocked together’? Do they have a stereotypical commonality, other than pure altruism? Could the LEED-PAC actually be a grouping of individuals who have vested financial or other interests in the outcomes of the coming elections, both in May and in November? One typecast observation is that the LEED-PAC is about maintaining a certain degree of control on economic development in LeeCounty; are they the so-called ‘establishment good ole boys’? Many of the LEED-PAC people have heavy financial interest in how development will transpire in the County. That doesn’t sound altruistic, rather it sounds eerily like keeping control on how money is made and who gets to make it. It also sound eerily like it entails how public tax dollars are spent, and who gets to benefit from that spending. Is the LEED-PAC a ‘Trayvon hoodie’ hiding something unknown, with unknown intent? Maybe it’s time to know just how innocent or sinister this group is. Perhaps someone will publish a column exposing just who these shadowy LEED-PAC people are and identify the businesses they run. Inquiring minds want to know.
“In fact, it’s rather a refreshing change. Back home we don’t have it referred to much at all. It’s because in Australia I don’t think you got Bottom on the telly, which is what most people know us for in England,” he says.
It isn't going to be all rainbows and unicorns of course. Life has bumps but I absolutely refuse to focus on them. They're irrelevant. I'll get through, I'll not only survive but I will thrive! Because I have, with practice, learned how to flip the coin and see the positive side.
When I was visiting family friends in Sweden a few years ago, I was intrigued to see that the man in the house next door had a robot lawnmower cutting his grass. We don’t see that so much in North America. The Swedes are ahead in other technological fields as well, from attendant-less gas stations, where you’d better know Swedish or else, to banks where a cheque is passed around as a curiosity because so many of the people there had never seen one.
Could Adam, the author behind The Avian Gospels, have set up this entirely bizarre, beautiful story with the hopes that we would make this connection on our own? Did he have advanced knowledge that his publisher would market the books as mini bibles, and that his collective narrators would spawn this type of thinking in his readers? Or is this me just throwing my own fucked up, twisted, agnostic views out there to see if something sticks?
Having said that, where with analog you had the work before and in the darkroom... now it is very much after... in the digital darkroom.
Activists say that the situation has not changed as a result of last year’s rallies.
"Everything's good," remarked Dad apropos of nothing as we drove back from the off-licence where he'd nipped out to buy some chocolate to see us through an evening of family viewing.
K-Kashi- Do you purchase their products, if so which ones? Yes, and I like the grain and fruit bars
Japan Airlines runs Boeing 777 service five days a week, on Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, Friday and Sunday. The Dreamliners will operate for four days, excluding Thursday, when the airline will operate Boeing 777.
county. In the Republic, where all of our rights are intact, our
Join corner B to corner D and press. Do the same thing for all the other squares that are above the fold line.
And Marcia Richards' had a recent linky post too, featuring great stuff, including an interview of Diana Gabaldon by Authors Road, and writing tips from Steinbeck.
I jumped on my bike and said bye to my life,
Gerrardo: Well it makes me hungry.
He is quick to forgive and move on.
Anyhoo, long story short, lots and lots of blacks in my last neighborhood. Like, every other house. So I was jogging in one of the tonier areas of my neighborhood and there are two dogs in the front yard of this one house. They went after me like I was made out of ham. All I got was a tiny nip on the ankle. They weren’t large dogs, but they were large enough to put a scare in me. Scared, angry me stood in the middle of the street, kind of paralyzed, screaming for the home owners to get their fucking dogs. A large black man comes out of the house behind me. I snippily ask if these are his dogs. He patiently says “No.” and proceeds to clear the way for me. The dogs are intimidated by his height and decidedly not-defensive posture. They slunk away. I offered an effusive “Thank you, Sir!” and continued jogging home. I was shaken. But felt extraordinarily grateful for the nice, big, calm guy who came to my rescue. More big black guys for my neighborhood, please.
We are thrilled that I'm 14 weeks pregnant now. I have moments everyday when I'm just amazed by it, that there is a living baby inside of me again, that I have a growing belly again, that my clothes are getting too tight, etc. I feel so fortunate.
Also, pay attention to the recent news story from Haiti about the Idaho missionaries - this international form of coercion occurs more often than we wish to believe, in countries all around the world. The only difference with Haiti? Was that Laura Silsby got caught.
There is no such thing as “green waste” where I live in Nevada County,. Most people take their green waste and turn it into their own mulch. Larger cuttings get thrown into what is called a “burn pile.”
following the threat by the UN to do
Well, it’s not that I’m lazy to blog or what,
Winkelmann said, “Lamborghini has always eyed the Indian market with a lot of interest. The past year saw the market grow substantially and we realize that being in one centre alone will not be enough. I hope soon, I will be here again to say, two were not nearly enough.”
Michelle Williams was also nominated, and she showed up in a very demure, beaded Chanel Haute Couture dress. I am not a fan of the top half, as it is a little too T-shirty. That would have worked on someone a lot older. Someone with bingowings and saggy boobs.
If, as Serano asserts, oppression based on being born female doesn’t exist, if there is no universal female class experience based on being female-bodied, if there is no need for a movement to dismantle male supremacy, Then WHY LORD WHY do these guys endlessly, relentlessly try to STOP FEMALES from organizing around FEMALE concerns?? If it’s so unimportant, then why do they care? Hahaha.
We soldier on without any tangible help from our elected councillors who trouser £9,735 a year expenses to get their hands dirty with this sort of thing.. Mark Roberts, tasked by village elders to get this sorted is still away with the fairies. Nor is he alone. Tolpuddle’s old friend, Karl Wallace, promised an investigative site visit over the Easter weekend but didn’t show up. Nor was he at the parish council meeting to hear villagers moaning about it all. Karl’s busy political portfolio currently includes extended sessions pressing flesh in Weymouth , seeking nomination as Blue Labour’s candidate at the next general election. Bon voyage, Karl.
The attack on Pearl Harbor, called Hawaii Operation or Operation Al by the Japanese Imperial General Headquarters was designed to prevent the US Pacific Fleet from interfering with their military actions in Southeast Asia, against overseas territories of the United Kingdom, Netherlands, and the US. The Japanese attack was so thorough that only 29 aircraft and five midget submarines were lost. The US death toll was 2,403. Only 65 Japanese servicemen were killed or wounded. One Japanese sailor was captured.
Image is important; this needs to be updated as studies show that people feel that it is a fictions person without an image.
He won’t reward you for your wasted time or your effort. Unfortunately, guys are a bit different.
It’s not a time to think, what else could I be eating for more variety or mouth happiness? And eating any off-product food during Phase 1 can be a slippery slope. Like the person I mentioned in an earlier post who assumed that cream and sugar were fine since coffee was allowed, there could be someone who assumed that (high-cal, high-fat) dressing was OK with a plain lettuce salad. Not everyone is calorie knowledgeable, and in Phase 1 we don’t count calories.
Straight away the DellArte site strikes a perspective author as being clean, crisp, well presented, and certainly big on words like ‘dreams’ and ‘aspirations’. We should be familiar now with this author solution services speak, after all, DellArte is run by the same company who now own such illustrious author solutions services as Xlibris, Trafford, iUniverse and AuthorHouse. In fact, looking through DellArte Press’ web pages, I’m sure I recognise some of those aspiring authors used in many of the advertising graphics. Seems, Author Solutions may have had a strong hand in the design and presentation of this site—so it makes sense the male and female models are the same!
The Power of Technology
3rd Edition was customizable, there were more options than you could shake a stick at and that lent to some very interesting character builds.
Arthur: Yeah, cause you and me, we made good decisions when we were 21.Do you remember decisions made at 21? Not always the best? Or are you one of those?
Firestar had broken my heart.
Keep it hipster keep it fresh keep it real
So, you have set your mind to achieve something, you’ve got some clarity, you have decided on a few things you want to manifest and you have taken some form of action to get the ball rolling, then something strange happens. You hit a wall!
Carissa Horton and Ethan Nichols were murdered last September in Tulsa by two blacks, in a racist atrocity that the national MSM considered meaningless.
Richards opponents can tell you first hand he is able to use his speed, wrestling ability and knowledge to go along with an explosive attack that can take the heart out of lesser men in the ring.
All you need to do is tell me about a novel I want to read. And I'll read it. Have confidence enough to let your writing speak for itself. You're a writer. I'm a reader. That's all we know, and all we need to know (sorry Keats, couldn't resist.)
I love how this chapter begins with an invitation to undress.
It was only a matter of time before I incorporated an Iris into the Vintage series... Love Purples, Love Irises.
*Allred and Allred Literary Agents (refers clients to "book doctor" Victor West of Pacific Literary Services)
Answer: We’re both 30 years old. I was born in Knoxville, TN but have spent most of my life in the Cincinnati and Dayton regions of Ohio most of my life. Joshua has been in Ohio his whole life. We both graduated from Lebanon City Schools which is a small town smack dab in the middle of Cincinnati and Dayton. Joshua and I both reside in Dayton, OH. He lives in the city and I live in a suburb of Dayton.
I saw people get out wheelchairs in 1970 in just a few weeks after starting L-DOPA (which had just been released in the USA) for their Parkinson’s disease. Could anything remotely similar happen in Alzheimer’s disease? I think it’s possible if the problems with thinking and forming new memories are due to the senile cluttering up the brain (a very big if). First, more than just a little bit of neuroanatomic and neurophysiologic background.
Johnstone, who works as a vermicompost worm farmer in George, South Africa, trained as a paralegal through Damelin, but has been unable to find work in the field since graduating.
Our goal is to link people together with thoughts and ideas that are uplifting. Now you can join us and share your insights as well! And I can't wait to hear what you have to say!
Chickens of course. :) Or did you mean a bird that is wild? I have a Meadowlark, that walks around my front yard. He flies but mostly walks. I really enjoy him and watch him all of the time being thoughtful.
Mr.Griffiths also called for health checks on immigrants when he responded to a question in the local paper the “Smegs Telephone”, “Immigration should be limited to those of sound health who have jobs and living accommodation arranged before they enter.” This was prescient as there was an outbreak of Typhoid in Smethwick in April 1965. Dr.John Briant the Deputy Medical Officer of Health said ”Smethwick had contained one outbreak but another might occur if people were let into the country without health checks.”
Iron Butterfly- Filled with Fear
But Clash of the Titans....
Why yes I do!
Chiara is playing model for this little bag. After all it used to be her pair of jeans she own for less as a year, still would fit perfect. She just added it to the collection of jeans with holes on the knees. So well, I already had it on my list to make a bag for a little someone and the fabric for the lining was already picked out a month or two ago and simply waiting. Jeans came along, movie was playing, scissors were close - ratzfatz - the legs were off. The pants. You know what I meant.
It reminds me of the story of the old cowboy who came to worship at a local church one Sunday morning. He put on his best pair of jeans, and his finest flannel shirt and his best hat and brushed off his good boots and felt good going into worship. Members of the church stared at him the whole service, and as the pastor greeted the old cowboy at the back door the pastor told the cowboy, he should take some time and talk to God about how he should dress when he comes into the house of God. Well next week the old cowboy decided to go back to that place of worship, and he put on the same clothes he had worn the week before. He did laundry them of course. As he sat in the pew waiting for worship, the pastor came up to him and asked, I thought I asked you to talk to God about how you should dress when you come to worship here. The old cowboy looked at the pastor and answered him, I talked to God and he said he had never been to this church and so he did not know the dress code.
i plan to write lots more about all of this but, for now, back to the fun stuff! lust lists for spring are abound with digital prints but one way to channel the trend has really captured the s/s '12 spirit...welcome to the print dress...
A FATAL INVERSION by Barbara Vine
Measure it roundly.
When I was growing up this was a very common dish in my house. My Mom would make this super-simple fried tofu at least twice a week as a snack, an appetizer, or a side dish in a larger Asian-style meal. When I visit my mother in Atlanta we eat it at every evening meal. We’ve been eating this same tofu dish for years and years because it is utterly delicious and surprisingly addictive. The mild curd develops unexpected flavors (sweet, a little sour, a little nutty) when fried, and the crisp edges give it textural interest and a nice chew. Dipped in something as simple as soy sauce, maybe with a little fiery chili paste in it, the little soy bean curd pillows are delightfully fun to eat as you pop them in your mouth. When I married Regina I discovered that she too loves this dish, which made me realize anew that fried tofu is ubiquitous in Asia. Fried tofu eclipses class and culture and politics — pretty much everyone who eats it loves it. Certainly my whole family loves it, including my tofu-obsessed father and my eight-year old son Bennet.
i am so grateful to be home.
On the other hand, Mr. Evangelos Venizelos, the present Minister of Finances and a candidate for the leadership of the party, appeared more down to earth, expressed his regrets for the situation of the country and stated that PASOK must rediscover its social roots and values. He would have been more convincing if he had made this speech at a non pre-electoral period, when opinion polls show PASOK below 10%!
“The farm looks wonderful, George. You’ve done miracles with the place.”
or Henry Livingston
You know, I always thought the book "Who Moved My Cheese?" was so ridiculously obvious that anyone who read it should have been saying, "Well, duh." The advertising industry is making me reconsider that opinion....but I'm scratching my head the entire time.
About 2 weeks ago I was looking at Art House Co-Op when a theme, Stitches and Folds, caught my eye and suddenly I was thinking clearly about drawing and note making that might lead to the creation of some textile work. I knew straight away how to work with this theme, both as a sketchbook for the project and as the basis of new work of my own, so I signed up. I’ve been transported back several decades to when I was doing needlework as a school subject and the endless samples of seams, tuck, pleats and darts that had to be worked. Suddenly I was seeing a mixed media sketchbook and larger textile pieces celebrating this functional stitching. My initial initial sketchbook is a very basic one I had on hand that has just kicked off my thinking and enabled me to get some simple preliminary thoughts down.
Suppose the commenter is right. What does that tell us about our society?
Oh this nighttimes so romantic,
This novel is written in a very poetic and thoughtful way. I was drawn to the book as soon as I read the summary of the story. I have always loved historical fiction, but most of the novels I tend to read take place in England. This was a nice change, since it is set in France and actually features the famous French author, Victor Hugo! In fact, this tale is about Hugo’s wife having an affair on him—a situation which actually happened in real life.
When my husband and I were getting ready for the reception in our room upstairs, I watched the sun set from our window. I held my breath as I watched a barge make the impossibly tight turn at the bend of the Mississippi.
What are you trying to do? If you are just trying to have fun, or participate in a political discussion, then have fun. But don’t expect sales to come in. Keep this in mind.
*2*
The afternoon was punctuated by Jackson screeching and ended up with me giving in to pleas from Jared to zone out to Plants vs. Zombies (which the other children watched, entranced, for some time). I succumbed to Camryn's request for me to buy eggs so she could make cookies, which resulted in a trip to Target with four kids to buy said eggs and the forgotten birthday present. Trips to Target with four kids are always exciting, so we tried to keep it short.
The InnerGameGoddess is dedicated to helping entrepreneurs achieve the lifestyle they desire while serving in an authentic way and living their life on purpose and with passion.
Diagnosis of amblyopia is often made during visual screening during routine infant check-ups and in the preschool years (aged three to five).
We believe in the K.I.S.S. theory. Keep. It. Simple. Stupid. So below are the commonly asked questions about “what we do.”
Five more minutes passed before Madrid took the lead. Ronaldo and Ozil combined to find Higuaín, who stepped away from Ekiza and, from the edge of the area, smashed it hard and straight into the net by the goalkeeper’s left-hand post. Four minutes after that a slick counterattack, launched as so often by Xabi Alonso, made it two. Ozil reached Ronaldo’s perfectly weighted low pass across the penalty area and side-footed home.
-To Sum It Up-
What are the 2 books I'm forgetting?? No, I shouldn't think about it. Okay, I had to look and be reminded. Yeah I'm definitely not revisiting those.
Remembering that we just got out of the most civil-war-filled century in Roman history (the 200′s, early 300′s), it’s logical that Constantine (who CERTAINLY knew himself how to civil-war it to the top) would solidify governmental changes to make sure that it was very difficult for generals/sons of emperors to make war against HIM. So… the policies of Constantine/Diocletian:
There are 13 new quarts of lima beans on the pantry shelf, and 4 1/2 quarts of crowder peas cooling. Oh, I hope our sweet corn does well this year! That Southern delicacy of crowder peas and corn is good eating. Wishing you a wonderful weekend, friends!
The site is young, and the founders are focusing on user experience — they’re only granting access to 10,000 women in first month.
I think there just may be a giveaway in the works.
I’ve been feeling more rested, and my blood sugar has been fairly stable, too. Like a snob, I’ve even rejected offers of chocolate chip cookies at work just to eliminate additional variables. Perhaps I should do that more often.
All this would seem surreal except, last night, I went to the Pull The Other One comedy club and saw the former Frank Sanazi (sings like Sinatra; looks like Hitler) appear as orange-faced Tom Jones soundalike Tom Mones and Martin Soan appeared briefly as Miss Haversham from Great Expectations sitting in a chair. His costume included the chair. You had to be there. Allegedly the costume took a year to make. He was on stage for perhaps two minutes.
Interview
Shred half an onion on a box grater and sauté in some butter until translucent. Add grits to pan with equal-ish parts water and milk, adding more liquid until grits are soft and the consistency you want them. Add a pat of butter and some shredded cheddar cheese, stirring to melt and incorporate. Add salt and pepper to taste.
During our four short days on the road, Jordan’s past and present were on display. From the busy Red Sea port of Aqaba through the historical Wadi Rum desert of Lawrence of Arabia fame, to the pink carved sandstone of Petra, the small country is capitalizing on its beauty, history, and geography. Its economy benefits from the trucks and the tour buses - an alliance that serves this petroleum absent country well and tourists most.
Velvet Underground Sunday morning US
Gomez is celebrating the launch of her namesake fragrance, a sweet scent housed in a tapered glass bottle topped with flirty purple and gold lips.
That message is in fact a philosophy that was passed down to Ang by whom he considers his greatest mentor his father.
As he does the man’s phone begins to ring. The little outside screen glows blue in the semi light of the alley. Bruce recognizes the number, but doesn’t pick it up.
So here is a little peak at what all we've done to keep the festive vibe around our home (please forgive the pictures, it is HARD to take good pictures of Christmas lights, and I took these during the day because I knew I wouldn't have time last night).
Roses also used as a simple token of affection and love of a man to a women so it's is very useful in a man courting a woman who wanted to win the heart of the woman...I remember my hubby always gave me a bunch of white roses and he succeeded...maybe because he gave me white roses he told me that is a symbol of pure intentions of love and I believed in him until now.
I encourage everyone to watch it ~ it's only about 5 min. long. The evening ended with some fruit pizza for dessert and then off to home. It is amazing how wonderful and spiritual your day can be when is is centered on the Savior. I am thankful for the Atonement, Christ's selfless sacrifice and the knowledge that with the ressurection He lives again. Happy Easter ~
"She is my rock. She has taught me to believe in myself, and more importantly, to pick myself up whenever I stumble...and she has always inspired me--to push myself to dream even bigger than anything she could ever dream for herself."
Cinderella’s got some new shoes to fill…
So, all this cleaning and decorating has me thinking about
Tony Blair had favoured delaying military action, he said, adding: “The Prime Minister’s arguments for more time, as I observed them from New York, appeared to win two weeks or so of delay, but no more.” continues here
This is hands down my favorite eyeliner of life, I have accidentally fallen asleep with this on and I wake up with it still being perfect. That my friends is TRUE staying power haha! Your waterline is the worst place for your eyeliner to wear off, so this is your best bet if you can’t always touch up your eyeliner through out the day. I have mine in Blackest Black. If you don’t have a brush, no worries… this comes with one!
They differ in some ways in some ways not
The vessels for the candles were old wine/ liquor bottles that were destined for the garbage. I simply cut them in half and placed them in the holes. It is important to leave the corks in place. If not you will end up with candle splatter on the table once the wax melts down the neck of the bottle (we learned this the hard way). The wood was some leftover red cedar that I had at the shop and the hangar was a piece of ground wire that I took off of a salvaged power pole.
"Ladies and gentlemen; remember what I had told you earlier about shame and its vicious grip on a man's life. Today we have a chance to relieve a man who'd lived with shame and pain for almost a year. I implore you to listen to him with empathy and to draw your judgments taking into account his overwhelming circumstances.....Mr. Nibras, would you please come forward"
If Florida’s legislators are ever shamed into ending their charter school favoritism, Miami Herald reporters Kathleen McGrory and Scott Haisson will have played a role. The two investigative journalists were joined by colleague Shiaa Sen last weekend in a story which exposed the policy of double-dipping federal grant money by declaring two schools exist within the same facility
That's it for now, but be sure to pop back later when Jo will be here with all the details of her challenge for the coming week!
Drawing in Church kept me busy (while I was listening to the Sermon) trying to get it all down on Paper! The Choir and Orchestra are back for the Season and the music was so uplifting and worshipful.
I offically quit Dillards to be a SAHM and with that wound up being so busy working freelance jobs that I could hardly call myself a SAHM! I always knew there were other opportunites out there but never had the balls to quit my "real" job to go for it. So glad that I did! I have opened so many new doors this year and feel so blessed as a makeup artist! Plus in addition to quiting my job, it did allow me more free time with Leland. Now I can pick and chose when I want to work. Which works out much better for our family!
If you think that studying and scrutinising each available text, seeing how well it corresponds to the world around him, and measuring it up to what seems to be real, is the correct way for Jeff to proceed, then what you’re supporting there is something called the scientific method. Science is all about doing this kind of testing, finding out what’s probably real by seeing how it looks from every angle of scrutiny possible, and if there’s any way that something can be shown to be wrong.
1. “russian incest”
For the days to be long,
The holidays were spent hosting lots of family, drinking lots of egg nog and consuming lots of xmas cookies. Oh and in the middle of all that my sister introduced me to a little show called Portlandia – OBSESSED.
Next: Learn to anticipate things. A parent is an expert at seeing possible dangers their children can walk into, mostly from experience. So, if you miss a snap shot because you lack this anticipatory experience, avoid condemning or punishing yourself! No one likes a “grumpy” photographer (parental or professional). Smile, laugh and enjoy the moment!
Here is the recipe for Sweet and Sour Chicken from Real Simple Magazine
According to the “National Crime Prevention Council“, being a bully is shown to be a gateway behavior, giving them the impression and teaching them that threats and aggression are acceptable behaviors, even in adulthood. This website is all about the long-term effects of bullying and that includes people who bully. Here’s what you have to look forward to if you are a bully as a youth:
To make a reckoning
Phreak: Sigh.
Steve Valerio, Jr.
Dream big my friends and it will be amazing what results out of your dreams!
As with most things I put on my list, once I finally make them I wonder why I didn't make them sooner. These cookies are no exception. They were a delicious way to end a lunch date with friends, tender and soft with a delicate vanilla flavor and just the right amount of sweet, spring colored frosting.
Mentorship is one of the greatest gifts you can give a child. Hendersonville FFA in Tennessee took this truth to heart when it launched the Passing Literacy Onward (PLOW) program. The goal of the program was to make reading interesting, educational and fun for elementary school children.
This book was my first non-fiction completely oriented to the topic of marriage. In fact – the Mr. brought it home for me without asking… And I am so glad that I took my time to read this! Bear with me as most of my highlights focus on the issue of divorce, but really it all goes hand in hand with marriage of course :) …
Congratulations on your Top Three spot, please take your Top Three badge for your blog!
Meyer had been arrested at about 01:00 for public drunkenness. He had apparently gone drinking after a fight with his fiancée.
We could also say that just by being born you have committed to being on this planet, which is in itself a bid for power. Many of you out there are still a bit ambivalent about that one, and until you truly commit to being here, spirit will not support you in the most powerful way. You could say it was not your choice to be here, your parents decided it for you and so on… That is giving your power away and allowing Martyrdom to rule. The Martyrdom we have plaguing us this year is actually providing us with an opportunity to eliminate the inner victim by taking responsibility for our lives and our bids for power, and committing to what we want through our actions as adults. We also need to stop blaming others for things that don’t work out.
6pm: Denounced my Irish roots for not bringing me luck in the form of back pain relief and made Mexican food for dinner.
So tell me what you want, what you really really want,
As I drove to their small village, I had no idea whether the trip would be worthwhile. She had insisted on the phone that she didn't want to sell, but at the same time, for a non-seller, she gave me a load of appetite- whetting information.
allAfrica.com: South Africa: Vavi to Tackle ANC Over Malema's 'Disdain':CONGRESS of South African Trade Unions (Cosatu) general secretary Zwelinzima Vavi yesterday said the bilateral meeting with the African National Congress (ANC) next week would be an opportunity to deal with how the ANC's actions had threatened Cosatu's functionality within the tripartite alliance.
As I see the packaging boxes in my garage waiting to be filled with Christmas, it’s always a little sad. So, last year I kept one of the golden ornaments out and left it hanging in my entryway all year. It will stay there from now on. Even though the Christmas holiday is coming to an end, the Christmas spirit can go on forever and the glistening of that ornament is just a symbol of that.
A trend I’m currently loving for the summer is lace shorts. I love the feminine look of the lace. Plus, they can be dressed up or dressed down; pair any of these shorts with a nice blouse and heels or mix them with a plain tee and flats.
“Where?” Paty asked.
The Center for Indian Law & Policy at Seattle University School of Law and the Bristol Bay Native Association (BBNA) has developed a project that will provide estate planning services to BBNA members. The members reside in 36 villages in a remote area around Bristol Bay, Alaska. We are seeking a full-time Fellow to reside in Dillingham, Alaska, where BBNA is headquartered, for 9 months, from September 2012 through May 2013. The Fellow will travel to villages with BBNA staff to meet with clients and provide estate planning services. The Fellow will be supervised by Center personnel and will have on-site contact with an Alaska Legal Services attorney. This is a unique opportunity for a recent law school graduate to gain hands-on legal experience in a unique location! BBNA members have special estate planning needs, and the Fellow will undergo training on those special needs, as well as estate planning for native Alaskans. While this is not a salaried position, travel and living expenses will be paid.
— My belly is making digestive enzymes to break down food. Thank you belly!
We've all seen it on television, but until you witness this place with your own eyes and get under the ribs of that incredible vaulted ceiling, you cannot fathom the beauty of Westminster Abbey.
DETROIT, Michigan. Nils Cyborg has spent his entire career with Chrysler Motors, a point of pride for the long-time Red Wings fan. “I’m a creature of Detroit,” he says as he stares out an empty parking lot in front of Plant #2, where the popular PT Cruiser model is manufactured.
Temptations beware.
Well that's it for me today.. I will be back in two weeks with another card :)
Yesterday, Jon and I met with a local pastor who wanted to meet us and see if there was anything they could do to help. What Jon said to him cleared up a lot for me. Apparently Jon is doing the same thing that he did when he was in Afghanistan, which was, keep as busy as possible so you don't have to think about things. He mentioned "fake it 'til you make it". Yeah, not at all reassuring to me. How do you do that?? I wish I knew.
Thanks so much for guest posting for me Megan!
And if someday soon, she is dappled in spotlight - please help me - all the better.
can never be returned to its former glory
20 Yet he did not waver through unbelief regarding the promise of God, but was strengthened in his faith and gave glory to God, 21 being fully persuaded that God had power to do what he had promised.
Startled, James dropped his hand from his face to the table. He looked up at the voice that destroyed his own fantasy. “Hel… Hello,” he responded.
I, for one, think this is fair. The issue of gay marriage is a pretty big issue currently, and I think we could easily, as Christians, see it the same way Lewis states above. I also think it would release many for the idea that Christianity is too judgmental.
Hello Bloggers
full of shit, no he was really leaving the
320GB 7200 rpm Hard Disk Drive,
Cricut
A: Billy Nolan or Tommy Ross, who would you take to the prom?
“They get paid a salary, but then there’s the palm variable. A 50-dollar bill might get you noticed. Depending on the restaurant, they might even take a 20. For an Upper East Side rip-off joint or a busy Midtown steakhouse a hundie should get you in the game, but it’s just as likely that if they don’t know you, they’re going to think you’re a d-----bag,” writes Bastianich in his juicy new memoir, “Restaurant Man,” out Tuesday.
Does it smell like a man lying? To many readers, I suspect it will.
Only wakes upon the sea.
#4- Charlie Blackwell/’No Frills’ Chris Escondido (I)
He felt that he should not perform any Vedic Rites to the Devas and the Pitrus, while under the Saapa (curse). After a fortnight of this painful existence, Gautama asked the other rshis, for a way out. At first they were silent, but on his repeated, humble, requests they asked him to do prayaschittam. Prayaschittam means a cleaning of the mind. They asked him to admit his fault and go around the earth (Prthvi) three times and come back and observe a vow (of fasting) for a month. Then go around Brahmagiri 100 and ekottara (eight?) times OR bring the Ganga and bathe in her and make one crore earthern images and worship Deva. Then bathe again in the Ganga and go round the mountain eleven times more. Then bathe the Earthern Image (Parthiva) with one hundred pots of Ganga.
I pretty much like any and all dressing/stuffing. Down to the Walmart brand boxed stuff you just add water to and let sit for 5 minutes. Oyster stuffing, though? That little unexpected kick is just fantastic. A faint seafood taste that is totally not overwhelming, and really sets off those great herbs and other deliciousness. Yum.
Two men appeared in the Sekhukhune Magistrate’s Court near Burgersfort in connection with the murder of Cope MP Jack Tolo.
It's made me think about where everything is, should I need to get them out in an emergency, because fire is something that can strike anytime and anywhere.
The Angel sat and thought for a moment. Technically, the man did have a bad day. It was crime of passion.
But don't fix me.
uh.
“But at Heathrow airport? Hmmm.”
All these colors are so pigmented and creamy. They last quite awhile, even when I’m wearing them while eating and drinking. You can go without reapplying for hours and still have the color on your lips.
full to the brim with happy faces,
Perfect!
The "Top Five" districts with the highest appeal rates, along with their affirmance and modified decision/reversal rates are:
....seal.
We have been busy for sure. The Kairos walk for the Smith prison unit was two weeks ago. As always Kairos is a time of powerful moves of the Lord, with many lives touched and miracles happening every day. Last Saturday I went back up there for the follow up day, where we begin to train them on how to support each other in that prison environment, and to integrate them into the existing church at the prison. With that comes revelations of ongoing problems and issues. I had two in my group who expressed their dismay at not being accepted in a prayer group on their cell block. At lunch I sat at a table with another inmate, who has been in prison 21 years. He shared an issue he had regarding someone who went through the Kairos walk but was still actively engaged in homosexual activity. Come to find out it was the same person I had talked with earlier. It’s a sticky situation, where I was being asked for advice from both individuals separately. The answer in both cases is to love and forgive. We can hate the sin, but must love the sinner. In the end we all stand before the living God, who knows all things, even the deepest thoughts of our hearts. It is He who is the judge, not us. And it is God whom we must answer too, not man. In prison there are many uncomfortable situations and seldom easy answers. I can’t talk about lots of it but thought I’d give you just a small glimpse.
Florida and Nevada
Hop along with us and be sure to see all the beautiful creations. Leave comments on each blog as well as this main one and become a follower on this blog.
Denied! Most men in Virginia City wore something Dickens would have worn. Mr. Stetson didn't sell his first hat until 1865, a few years after my books are set. Mark Twain, (my vocabulary source for 1862), describes himself as arriving in Virginia City with a slouch hat, a soft felt hat usually of brown or black. That's the type of hat my character is wearing on the front cover of my book. So in my books my male characters wear plug hats, stovepipe hats or slouch hats. And my women are almost universally in bonnets. The dude on the black and white carte de visite up above is Tom Peasley, a famous Virginia City Sheriff from 1866.
All Digi Stamps will be available as black & white tiff or jpeg files so you can color them any way you like. Once I have all of the drawings complete and in correct file formats, they will be posted to my ETSY Shop. I will post more information when available.
Just two years after the cutting of Coffee’s Road, Lowndes County was cut from Irwin. In those early days of Lowndes County, most of the settlement had occurred along the route of Coffee’s Road, or else along the Alapaha and Little rivers. Among the earliest waypoints on the Coffee Road were the homes of Sion Hall, Daniel McCranie, Hamilton Sharpe, and James Lovett.
Up next was Emma Wild from CBI on the business perspective on IP. She stated that the UK IP regime is respected around the world, and reminded us that many UK industries rely on patents, copyright, and trade marks to protect their designs and creativity. She considered that the Government needs to be a champion for IP and IP rich industries, and advocated collaboration with industry to protect business models which rely on IP. In particular, she spoke against expansion of copyright exceptions that would undermine these business models.
Box Office: 01482 323638
Dinner: 2 98% fat free hot dogs with ketchup and saurkraut, carrots, 3 very small red potatoes
is stacked in them.
Tuna noodles:
There are no magic pills. Losing weight quickly is not healthy and it is not sustainable.
Siew-Nya Ang, 37, East Brunswick, N.J.
under the bushes
Papers: The Paper Company kraft cardstock, Bazzill cardstock, Neenah cardstock
Danny went. And so did I. Sophia and I went straight to bed. We were tired, and were worried about not having enough zzz's in the bank to drive back to KC the next day. Sophia had gotten to see Andy finish, while I was pacing Greg. Andy had finished in a solid 4th place, overall, in eighteen hours! Not bad for a kid from Leavenworth, Kansas! And his best friend, Dallas had gotten to pace him for the last 13 miles, and pushed him hard...Andy moved up 2 places in the race under Dallas' pacing tenure. Schweet! And Greg ended up finishing in 28-something hours, well within the time limit for the race.
Before I go in to the details of this article, I need to provide a precursor. I will be providing details on how you can respond as well as awareness to avoid and/or prevent being a victim of such an incident. I learned these things through being involved in law enforcement for the past several years and being exposed to some top-notch training opportunities. However, I am not revealing any kind secret or sensitive information. Anything I am providing in this article is available through a variety of open sources, especially the Internet. I am just putting it all in one convenient place.
I was a mess. Point blank.
I really wanted my weekend manicure to be my new Edyta polish. The first coat applied somewhat awkwardly, though, and I had apprehension. It dried fine, so I added a second coat. I nudged my thumb by accident (shoot!), which left a big smudge that I tried to fill. Then I put on a coat of Seche Vite, hoping that it would make everything better. But it wouldn't dry. It was weird... just kind of got gummy. :( I decided to sleep on it and see if it looked better in the morning, but alas, it didn't. At least my Edyta pedicure lived to tell the tale. The nails got wiped, though.
Here is some food for thought:
HAYWOOD
And the obligatory paper plate and ribbon hat picture. It took two plates to make that monstrosity.
So, let me show you today, Avon - Coral beat. I bought this polish last autumn, but I wore it a few weeks ago (just when my nail problems started).
It was a fun morning. Within minutes of getting out of the truck parked in a field of grass all three kids and Nathan were sneezing. Nathan and I just laughed about it.
Spilling shit from greasy oil tankers,
Despite being a fully illustrated pip deck, the Thoth influences on the Sun and Moon Tarot (U.S. Games, 2010) are perhaps most apparent in the Court Cards. The Kings are youthful-looking and ride horses, the Pages are Princesses, and some of Lady Frieda Harris' perspective and symbolism is maintained.
ASOS launch a 90's rave revival collection, aptly entitled REVIVE. Staying clear of the cliche fluro colours and traditional rave prints (hello tie dye anyone? ok, yes please...) the collection is mostly navy and white, with a muted lilac print worked in.
Pick over beans, wash and cover with water. Let soak 8 to 12 hours. Then add water to cover, add all ingredients except pork and boil in a dutch oven for one hour. If using a bean pot or a slow cooker, boil in a separate pot first.
What I find most interesting in regard to my tattoos is children's reactions to them. It seems that kids are still so naive and unscathed by society that they are intrigued, rather than wary or judgemental. I remember being at the salon, shampooing a client's hair, and a little girl who was standing by watching me at the sink was honestly concerned that my tattoos were going to wash off in the water. It was one of the cutest things I've ever encountered.
The girls were in the back and mommy and daddy did all of the paddling. We had a canopy over us so no need to worry about the sun.
Good morning everyone-I hope its as sunny and lovely where you are as here! Its Saturday so new challenge day at One Stop Craft Challenge and our new theme is 'Tag, Youre it!' so we want you to create a tag or include a tag on your project. This is my first play with distress inks, and my lovely new Sepia accents and I have fallen in love! I found some great gift bags, 2 for 99p and so thought I would try making a matching gift set.
Both The Harpist and Fish Frye hope you can join them. Wear green. Practice your Irish jigs.
I've been thinking a lot about the distinction between simply worrying and having anxiety, but in truth, linguistically speaking, they aren't that different in meaning. But in my mind, having a healthy concern for someone or a situation can be worlds apart from full blown anxiety. And, of course, everyone has a different propensity for worry/anxiety.
I now have a bionic cervix. Does that make me a superhero? A super woman who is now able to carry a child to term! Oh, wait. That's most women.
Ranking the venues
I can't see you with my head tipped back but again I hear the smile in your voice. "Good girl. Now spread your legs just a little for the nice man."
The LTTE has been condemned by various groups for assassinating political and military opponents. The victims include Tamil moderates who coordinated with Sri Lanka Government, Tamil paramilitary groups assisting Sri Lankan Army. The assassination of the Sri Lankan president Ranasinghe Premadasa is attributed to LTTE. The seventh Prime Minister of the Republic of India, Rajiv Gandhi, was assassinated by an LTTE suicide bomber Thenmozhi Rajaratnam on 21 May 1991.[167] On 24 October 1994, LTTE detonated a bomb during a political rally in Thotalanga-Grandpass, which in turn wiped out most of the promonent politicians of the United National Party, including presidential candidate Gamini Dissanayake MP, Cabinet ministers Weerasinghe Mallimarachchi and G. M. Premachandra, Ossie Abeygunasekara MPand Gamini Wijesekara MP.[168][169]
Coming Soon: The Crisis Of Advertising, Part 3 - "Talent"
Either way, I can't wait to see him.
She instructed me to remove my wool coat and place it on the table, which I did. With a pen-light, she went through its pockets, extracting gas receipts, reporter’s spiral-bound notebook, two pens, keys, loose change, and my Canadian passport. She extracted a computer printed receipt from the breast pocket, read it carefully, and asked me to identify it.
My last post about Judy R Clark, the designer we have been researching for the Design and the Market module, was fairly short and sweet, as I didn’t want to give too much away before our presentation! Now the presentation is over, I thought I would post up more of our research.
What use is it to compare you to something off scale, making true requital impossible? I have been there, and it did not please me. We live at the height of our eyes, somewhere between the atoms and the stars. I used to loathe that simple fact…
But soft! What beer through yonder glass breaks?
Mr Vaz warned yesterday that blaming a particular race or religion for grooming young girls for sex “risks opening up a Pandora’s box over race relations”. If he would only take off his goggles for a minute he might spot the National Front supporters strutting their rancid stuff outside the Liverpool courtroom. The intimidation of two Asian barristers to the point where, shockingly, they withdrew from the case suggests that the contents of Pandora’s box are swarming all over the place.
Smoke is deadly, sometimes.
Northgate used to be a very safe neighborhood. Now it's like Detroit!
Daryl Hannah who appeared in the 1984 film Reckless that Michael Hutchence and I worked on ideas for the script together also appeared in the 1987 film Wall Street along with Sheen. (The INXS song Reckless Ways with my name in the lyrics was written at the same time Hutch and I worked on the script for Reckless.)
The sounds of the show
Anyway, the resident eye candy on display on The Groovy Show was one Kam Nelson, who Ellison was assured by the producers was an exceptional Renaissance Gal who all but cured the common cold with one hand behind her back - and yet - well, let's let Harlan explain it:
Of course Kṛṣṇa was present to tell Arjuna what his work was, but what about us? Śrī Kṛṣṇa was personally directing Arjuna to act in such and such a way, but just because Kṛṣṇa is not personally present before us, we should not assume that there is no direction. Indeed, there is direction. In the last chapter of Bhagavad-gītā the proper work which we are to perform is given.
We stayed in the mountains the next day, checking out Wli Falls – west Africa’s highest waterfall. I somehow got turned around on the trek up to the high falls but eventually made it to where the guys were waiting. Amazing scenery that not many people were taking advantage of (at least when we were there).
White and orange card stock
are merely where my tears fell
Mel B
No words needed (favorite photo or picture, yours or others you want to share):
“Very good. Colin Davis. I am Brumby. Pleased to make your acquaintance.” Brumby opened one of the doors and motioned Colin in ahead of him. “Mr. Colin Davis!” he announced.
But they aren’t completely dead and so I look at Xbox 360 the Official Xbox Magazine for some of my monthly reading. One thing to note about the magazine straight off is that all the reviews can be read at the magazine’s website, kind of a set back but I feel people read a magazine for a companion on the journey or something to pick up which does help separate itself from an internet page in which you seek to find information.
I always give my mom home made gifts because I know that she really appreciates them. She doesn't care how much money I spend and she knows that just starting my career - I don't have much.
I am going to describe this from the bottom up. I am wearing my dark brown year old Ugg boots of which the right boot already has a small hole over the big toe much to my continual annoyance. My legs are clothed in an old pair of dark blue jeans and my torso is masked by a two year old Mothercare M2B black and grey stripped maternity top. Nice. I really do need some new clothes.
pried loose
(Note- You'll want the cupcakes to have a bit of a dome above the top edge of the cupcakes liners, so fill the liners about 2/3 -3/4 full. I've found that I can not plan to use the whole batch of cupcakes, because due slight inconsistencies, some may rise quite enough to use for this technique. Plan accordingly.)
gray flannel suit
Cocoa powder- 1/2 cup
But here are a few photos of my Ravishing Rosettes necklace. This is a design by Smadar Grossman beaded by me, Vimala Nichols. I used 8mm Black Czech Druks, size 8/0 & 11/0 seed beads in Matte Black and Gunmetal, and Black 3mm Czech Fire Polish rounds.
Brazilian President Dilma Rousseff’s visit last week to Washington, DC, offers an occasion to consider how some once-poor countries have broken out of poverty, as Brazil has. Development institutions like the World Bank have advocated improving business law as being essential to success. Are they right?
I am in Barcelona Spain this week about to head to Rome. I was able to go inside Antonio Gaudis La Sagrada Familia and wanted to share a photo with you all. This is such an incredible work of architecture it took my breath away when I entered.
She had just left the clinic and was waiting at the intersection of London Road and 1st Street when two men, one armed, approached her car at about 8.55am.
Many of the unfilled jobs are in health care, but more are in vocational fields such as welding, metal work and precision machining, where jobs paying $20 an hour or more go unfilled.
Arabella
Today is the day!!!! Elemental has landed!!
—-By K. D. Kelly Amazon Reviewer
And so it occurred to me to blog about it, in the event it saves any tourists currently in the City of Light - or any planning a vacation here soon - from being ripped off.
If he is truly my priority I will realize that the brownies can wait; the dishes can sit there when he needs me.
Thursday- We have a friend over (who was at the meeting last night). It was funny, I remember doing this as a kid. Last night we picked up the girls' friend, Ashley, to go to the meeting with us. After the meeting, we went to drop her off and I was standing there talking to her mom (another homeschooler) and I hear Ashley say "did you ask your mom?" So, Marti turns around and asks "Mom can Ashley spend the night". I remember doing this to my mom so many times. It was great though because my answer was, of course, "YES!" and better yet, it was "yes" on a "school night"! Love it!
We have these records now.
We took the bus back to Southend and walked to Southend Victoria station. This is actually quite a pretty little station but unfortunately, as Tigger was taking photographs, she was challeng­ed by a member of staff who informed her that photography was prohibited “under company policy”.
1) The one with no commitment issue (most probably the case). He either is sick or he’s not that into you.
So, boy, I tell you what, it took me a while to get going, but by 1 AM you just couldn't keep me off the floor!
Countryside
So, first up, these three books came from The Works on Tuesday. "But Ellie, didst thou not already pillage Ye Olde Works of Yonder Town last week?" I hear you cry. Well, yes, but this was a different store with different stock, and I was hurting after my first physiotherapy appointment. I also came home with a bundle of super-nostalgic sweets from the old-fashioned sweet emporium, so you can see what kind of mood I was in. Anyway, Arlene Russo's The Real Twilight: True Stories of Modern Day Vampires was the first book I saw, and for £1.99 I thought it might be interesting to see just how far weird vamp-obsession can go. Cash, Johnny Cash's famous autobiography, was tucked under a heap of other books so I plucked that out as well. And just as we were about to leave, I spotted a hardcover copy of Karl Pilkington's An Idiot Abroad hidden behind a big display. I think he's hilarious but his books are usually so darn expensive, so £4.99 seemed a pretty good deal!
Marcel, the comedic Magician was up after me and succeeded in freaking out all of the aforementioned best friends on their shroom trips with his magic… messing with their minds. (Revenge is sweet)
I miss the hope that Little Poppet gave us.
I'm going back to bed now...got up at 3:30 and couldn't sleep. Thanks again for reading here and being the best "support group" ever.
Hello. I am from Edinburgh, live now in Caithness in the far north in a house next to the beach and have always, in different ways, worked with words. I was a journalist but soon realised that didn’t match the dream I nurtured of ‘being a writer.’ I did the travelling thing – wonderful adventures in Greece, Turkey, Israel and working on a yacht on the Mediterranean. I studied speech and drama, specialised in voice work and taught for a good while. Immersing myself in other people’s words was an excellent apprenticeship. I also became involved with the world of storytelling – so poetry, drama, stories – and speaking poetry, feeling the sounds and rhythms, aiming to bring the images in poems and stories to life – that has been my work for twenty years. I also took an MA in creative writing and personal development from the University of Sussex. I am also lucky to come from an artistic family. My aunt Helen started the Craigmillar Festival Society and as I was growing up that, and the annual inspiration of the Edinburgh Festival, all showed me that creativity and art helps set people free. I live with my lovely partner, our dog Flora and clucking hens.
Parking for Beckman Auditorium is located at 332 South Michigan Avenue, Pasadena (south of Del Mar Boulevard). For information, call (626) 395-4652 or, outside the Pasadena area, 1 (888) 222-5832. Individuals with a disability should call (626) 395-4688 (voice) or (626) 395-3700 (TDD) for information and assistance.
Let me explain what and how the built-in search function works with WordPress, for those left confused and frustrated as I was.
The necessary amendments have already been made to the Births and Deaths Registration Act 1953 and the Children Act 1989 relating to how parental responsibility is acquired by unmarried fathers.
I’m sure you are curious. Let me just say it involves urine. And a lot of it. If you aren’t that interested in reading about pee then I suggest you stop now. Because pretty much that’s what this whole post is about…
All other people in their decisions, behaviors, and thinking
What we forgot, however, was that our children were by then big enough to sit unaided in front of a computer, and to tackle it, also unaided. One morning, we found all three of them huddled around the precious contraption, that we thought we had left safely turned off and off-puttingly covered the night before, taking more or less orderly turns at hammering away at mouse and keyboard, exclaiming at findings and commenting on procedure. Never mind about exercising parental authority right there and then, the facts were that the children turned to us to actually inform us about computer management tricks that we had timidly glimpsed on the Advanced Uses pages of the leaflet. This was as much a first for them as it had been for us but, well, the kids didn’t know about gloves, and their breathing was profoundly relaxed.
that you may bless the Holy Father and all the clergy;
After that, I applied to work as an interpreter for a rural school district, got hired and have worked with Deaf and hard-of-hearing kids the past several years. Currently, I’m working towards getting my educational endorsements to be certified in this field. The Internet and high-speed cable modems allow me to call my parents (who live over a thousand miles away) several times a week and chat in ASL. This year Mom and Dad will celebrate their 66th wedding anniversary!
It's not the only way of life, though, and when Roger sees a chance to escape he fights for it - little knowing that love, loss, shocking revelations and, ultimately, war lie ahead of him.
It was the Ritz. Paranoia was assigned a long room with an L-shaped alcove and a door at each end. We set up a little light show at the L and the customers would enter there, then continue through the room where merchandise was displayed, and exit by the cash register at the other door. Enormous crowds of straight people showed up, and every day several of our buddies came out from New York City, dressed in their hippie drag, to help us.
I have an intense love affair with hummus. It is my favourite bean/legume based dip or spread around. Hummus is great served with veggies, home made pita chips or spread onto a wrap or in a sandwich. It is also incredibly healthy, packed full of protien, good fats, fibre and vitamins. Now I know not everyone shares my affection for this Middle Eastern dip, so today I wanted to share a fun twist on the traditional chickpea dip. It’s pretty darn amazing, and I think may even stand a chance at converting non-hummus fans.
All I want for my kids is to be included I don't want them to go through the same pain I have
Kris
Eat the food: I am making lots of herbal teas from wild herbs I collected last year. Strawberry leaf, dandelion leaf and red clover flower. A good woman's tea.
“What must we do to win? We must educate, engage, evangelize and eradicate.”
Cut each log in to discs approximately 1/8 inch thick and place on a parchment lined sheet pan. Sprinkle lightly with the sea salt.
I think I fit that bill perfectly!
This same species of man, grown one stage poorer, no longer possessing the strength to interpret, to create fictions, produces nihilists. A nihilist is a man who judges of the world as it is that it ought not to be, and of the world as it ought to be that it does not exist. According to this view, our existence (action, suffering, willing, feeling) has no meaning: the pathos of "in vain" is the nihilists' pathos--at the same time, as pathos, an inconsistency on the part of the nihilists.
(*The fan needs to be balanced. Do you know how much of a PAIN IN THE ASS it is to balance a ceiling fan? Well, it's a pain in the ass enough that we've lived there for 8 months now, and still haven't gotten around to doing it. So the fan needs to stay at a relatively low speed so that it doesn't wobble all over the place, and make an ungodly racket. Hence the placebo-ness of it. It's not doing much, but maybe trying to trick my brain into thinking it's helping keep things cool, maybe. I'm not really sure.)
The Universal Human is connected through the heart to the whole of life, evolving consciously and helping to co-create a new kind of spiritual path, something we’ve never experienced before, but which is perfect for our time.
Two decisions were made – the first person was saved by voters, the remaining two contestants then sang for their lives, and one was saved by their coach.
It's a pretty basic design - a great clean and simple look - and I love the use of the Diagonal Scoring Plate to create the subtle background. I used Whisper White and Concord Crush (which is retiring at the end of May!) for my cardstock and added Pear Pizzazz (which is ALSO retiring at the end of May!) and Daffodil Delight for accent colors.
“The people behind them are not residents in the district, but we have issued warrants for their arrest.”
So, there are disappointments. There are exceptions. There are ‘oh why isn’t that there?’ moments. But for an easily handled book - there’s a lot in it - including what to do about the pests you don’t want - which makes more sense than may seem at first sight. Are there any pests you would ‘want’?
I have changed the second week’s class to Tuesday, 18th October to accommodate Clarissa Hawthorn, former lecturer in ceramic history at the University of South Africa who has kindly agreed give us a talk and Power Point presentation on the philosophy of wabi sabi before we embark on the making of the tea bowls.
Everyone is going to hate this. This is very unlikely. Are some people going to hate it? Possibly. Everyone has such wildly different tastes, and what one person loves, another person might loathe. Which means, if some people hate it...you're also going to have some people who love it.
Bottom Centre - This canvas was painted then spread with gesso which had crushed eggshell in it.
and then vacates that body........
Father never You take Your eyes off me this year to Your glory in Christ Jesus! Amen!
We have once again some amazing prizes to be won, thanks to our generous sponsors Penny Black, Stampalot, Crimson Cloud, and Crafts U Love.
A new commentary published online in the Feb. 1 issue of Nature says sugar is just as “toxic” for people as the other two, so the government should step in to curb its consumption.
Chocolate Guinness Cake
last
Instantaneously she was nude, her honey brown skin radiant in the flickering of the candles. Her feet light as feathers floating down into the tub, submerging and disappearing in the suds. Totally covered in warm waters haunted with a jasmine aroma, Vonne C. began to relax. Washed from head to toe, every inch of her was scrubbed with painstaking detail.
Best Old-Timer (Your favorite read of the year, published BEFORE 2011.): Hunger Games by Suzanne Collins
Thank you for letting me watch movies over and over again. Especially, Twilight and Big Bang Theory.
Undoubtedly one of the boomiest, bumpinest, bring the club to rubblinest tracks that we rang twenty-twelve in with was Flo Rida’s Good Feeling. With Sugar and Right Round as two singles of his that come to mind, we know Flo is no stranger to sampling. However, when I found out that Levels was another sample, I was shocked. ”Good Feeling” was club gold, and when more and more people found out about Le7els, that track itself started smelling like hotcakes and sold as such.
As April comes to an end today, we say goodbye to my awesome design team. :(
But moisture wicking in your t-shirts and your shorts? Well, that’s not only not effective at cooling you, it’s counter-productive.
The staggering absence of Jo Ann and Malcolm.
Shiner decided to re-release it 97 beer as one of its regular lines of beers. Pours jet black, thin head that dissipates fairly quick. Dark roasted malt taste, nice and smooth mouth feel with a clean finish. Label and taste is different from when it was released as the 97 year anniversary beer.
I'll still have to run into the living room every time I need to check my outfit, but it's better than nothing!
Here are the specs!
I was twelve years old... didn't know much about cancer then.
So cute... look at how big that hat is :)
Fax: +33 (0)4 93 38 22 69
I am no photographer (obviously, just look at the pictures) but over the past few years, I came across views that really capture my attention. During those times, I feel it necessary to snap a picture, using whatever is available (yes, sometimes even a camera phone) to capture a specific scene, a specific moment.
Jamaica gets the easy nod for the 4x1 because they’ve finished the race and set two WR’s in the last three Majors. However, I’ve felt for a decade that the WR is soft – and it’s still soft. And the U.S. showed – without Tyson Gay – that it could run leg for leg with Jamaica in Daegu, until disaster struck! This event will be one of those barber shop/internet message board conversation pieces throughout 2012. As for the 4x4, Jeremy Wariner – injured. Tony McQuay – injured. Intermediate hurdlers – subpar. And LaShwn Merritt still crossed the line first. Hard not to make the U.S. the favorite.
4 tablespoons butter
Dennis
Universality must first find itself within itself; then it must find itself in the fullness that fills, in the highest light, in the hub of light, in the divine light.”
As for Jon, he's just doing his usual: working and reading and hanging out and being a dad. It has been so helpful to have him around to help with potty training! He's changing schedules for a few weeks, but then we hope he will be put permanently on his current shift because it has worked REALLY well for us with school, work, and Kara schedules. If he can keep this shift, we will rarely need a babysitter while I am at work or school, which would be a huge relief.
We've had to cut costs. We've had to make certain decisions regarding our finances. Do we really need this thing or that? I certainly do look at our grocery bill each week and think, "If I buy conventional meats and produce and products, we'd have x-amount of extra money each week. That would save us a lot!" But would it...really?
This will update the /etc/vfstab file so that volume devices are
“But the natural man receiveth not the things of the Spirit of God; for they are foolishness unto him; neither can he know them, because they are spiritually discerned.”
For Mary was to be married to Joseph but before they came together, she was found to be with a child. In Mary’s day this was against the law. Now, Joseph her husband was a righteous man and because of this, he choose to not expose her flaw. Then one night in a dream an Angel appeared and said, “Joseph, do not be afraid, for what Mary has is from God not man. You will name the child Jesus for he will be the sacrificial lamb.”
Hi everyone and welcome to Wednesday! Half way through the week - yippee! Today I'm sharing a card showcasing one of our brand new stamp sets, Timeless Classics. I love this new set, with its vintage cars and numerous sentiments (in those fabulous fonts!)
It all takes place in Cybercity. The story starts with the blue car passing the red one brutally. The driver of the red car is not amused and this leads to a chase.
Rogue Brewery / Brewer's on the Bay Mocha Porter
Here’s my take on the three workouts. Bob’s 20-minute workout stands on its own. It’s fun to do, and is great for lifting your mood. The next workout is a 10-minute segment with Jillian, using a lot of the same moves from her ’30 Day Shred’. It is a great addition to the first one for an added challenge. The third workout is with Ajay Rochester and is also 10 minutes long. I find this one boring and not as challenging as the others. Being that it’s the third workout, I guess I thought it would be really hard, but it’s not. It requires less movement than the other two, and is a lot more repetitive. That said, beginners might like it.
-The thing I value more than anything in the world is _________.
Point three is put so coyly. The Pattison brothers were, in reality, wildly extravagant. In spending on their premises (remember those grand offices) , their advertising and their lifestyles. Again, there will be more about that later. Put simply, their expenses were way more than the business could support. It was all bound to go terribly wrong. The whisky crisis just made that day sooner.
10 Truths Black And Hispanic People Know, But White People Won’t Admit:
I am now halfway through An Abundance of Katherines, and yesterday, I just received notice that the hardcover version of Fault that I placed on hold was ready and waiting for me.
Surf’s Up Nintendo DS
4) The ‘Three Special Steps’ song from ‘Special Agent Oso’
Dianna Agron: I've heard this dress described as blah but its one of my favourites from the night, she looks divine.
All you need to do to lose weight is eat less fat and do more exercise.
You can send guests a complex three-dimensional invitation or put your invite on a DVD. You can even send a singing telegram, but you’d still have to send a paper reminder since no one will remember everything the messenger sang.
Interesting technique. I wonder if he used it on any of his other parasuicidal patients and whether it ever actually worked.
The disease is easily prevented by the use of a canine distemper vaccination and cleanliness of the kennels. Disinfectant and dryness kill the canine distemper virus, so kennels should be dry and airy and disinfected often.
Leaving a ‘well’ in the center, sprinkle the mozzarella cheese over the tomatoes.
We read many poems and and looked for rhyming words.
Here are the instructions and rules:
Remember me telling you about an unassuming cookbook a friend had gifted. Well that book is called 200 curries by Sunil Vijaykar and it has sooo many amazing and super easy recipes, perfect for a lazy bum like me. This pilaf recipe has been adapted from the book and can be whipped up in no time. The ingredients list may look massive, but really, it can be whipped up in a jiffy. Its also kind of like a one pot meal, perfect for those winter nights indoors.
Rapunzel by The Brothers Grimm
As this post is scheduled I'm wondering if we will actually see any Sunshine this year!
The Tanaiste would get €115,782 and the Taoiseach would get €135,792 over two years on severance.
But Suzanne Collins thinks it should be more than that. I would agree with her.
And He showeth mercy upon the last, and careth for the first; And to the one He giveth, and upon the other He bestoweth gifts. And He both accepteth the deeds, and welcometh the intention, and honoureth the acts and praises the offering.
God to come on earth as it is in heaven, and
Concurrent with the development of the HDSB 2008-2013 Capital Plan, we have our own West Oakville program and accommodation challenges to tackle. French Immersion program enrolments in Ward 4 will exceed staff projections and Forest Trail’s capacity to accommodate them by this fall.
You’re just what he wanted to make.
Sooo last week I posted Wild Wednesday, and you guys really seemed to like it….
· Strong quantitative, analytical, benchmarking and statistical skills
At Lady Ashley Designs, we have a great selection of coffee mugs for the teams that train in the area so stop by and show your support and pick up a mug for your favorite team!
Marr focussed heavily this week on the mood and atmosphere in the cities, some of which, despite their size, managed to retain real community spirit and seemed to feel more like a village than a city of such enormous proportions. He spent a night 'slumming it' with a family in Dhaka (where he was compared to Mr Bean) and also revelled in the 'Dancing Days' in Mexico City which, despite being one of the most dangerous cities in the world suffering for 500 kidnappings a month and 3 murders a day, seemed friendly and joyful.
12-It Hurts Me Too
I received an interesting challenge this week from Badaude, a fellow Paris-based blogger. On her blog, Badaude had imagined a fantasy gathering of artists with connections to Paris and took this very mixed group on a twenty-first century night out. She then challenged three other Paris bloggers to imagine something similar - given a completely free choice, which artists would we select to accompany us on a night out, and where would we take them? Such conundrums are always fun, but this one would also give me the opportunity to write about some real events that have always fascinated me, and mix them with others that I would have the freedom to invent.
After 500 years, I applaud ASDA for finally getting the UK public up to speed.
Recently un-earthed by Hip-Hop writer and editor extraordinaire Aqua we got a previously un-released (unless you got the advance copy of "The Love Movement" too) intro for A Tribe Called Quest's last group album to date, "The Love Movement".
Red Hot Chili Peppers lead singer Anthony Kiedis was convicted in 1990 of sexual battery and indecent exposure against a female George Mason University college student who was working backstage at the Chili Peppers' concert on April 21, 1989 at the Patriot Center in Fairfax County, Virginia.
15. Walking Into Sunshine - Central Line / 7:54
I expected the trajectory of Love Child to be a curve that ascended irregularly, but it descended from the top left of the painting. This meant that I had been mistaken as to the protagonists’ major character arc, and that in sticking to chronological order, I had missed their main transformation. Because the scenes on the left were separate and scattered, and formed chunky strands that came together on the right, I had also missed the dissociation between their processes of transformation.
Guns, only 84 worked in 2010,
Im starting to feel that itch to do more photoshoots.
Ending: After an exciting chase through Jason's subterranean lair, Final Girl Whitney and her brother Clay, dupe Jason using Whitney's resemblance to Jason's mother (Part 2 callback) and dispatch Jason with his own weapon. They dump him in Crystal Lake but as they sit on the dock resting Jason bursts through grabbing Whitney and...ROLL CREDITS! Stinger ending, Jason from the Lake. Classic.
‘He shook his head.
Of the 48 backers so far registered, some come from as far as France, Portugal and the United States while, based on their first names, there is approximately a 60/40 female/male split.
By noon I was ready to create something fast and nutritious. I pulled fresh kale, half of a raw red-garnet sweet potato, a head of red cabbage, and my favorite nuts out of the fridge drawer while dry fruit came from the cupboard.
action packed for sure.
Well, lack of control really. A lack of control of what is digitized from my works. After all, come July the rights to my first two books will revert back to me and technically it will mean I will be out of print and Google will be allowed to digitize my books without my say-so.
2And she being with child cried, travailing in birth, and pained to be delivered.
P.S. - I hope you like the red, white, and blue elephant and donkey sugar cookies I enclosed. They were only supposed to have white and blue icing on them, but my three-year old helped make them and she had an owie at the time, hence the red coloring. I was going to send a tea bag, too, so you could have tea and cookies, but Tea Party stuff seems to be getting a bad rap lately and I didn’t know your fillings on that, so I decided against it.
For both me and my dh, it felt good to be out with friends. We haven't seen many people in the past 14 almost 15 months. It feels like the tide is slowly changing... we're ready to be out more. And perhaps it's a conscious/unconscious way for us to get ready for our next child - we'll certainly want/need the support of friends to help us as new parents to a living child, and help us raise our girl. I am so hopeful that this will be "real" - real in the sense that my baby will make it here alive and remain that way. Weird to write that. How many parents think about their pregnancy/expectant child in such a way? Too many, I know.
All night.
I pursued representation with an agent, but nearly every agent told me the same thing, “I love your writing, but the market for your type of fiction is too small.” I even had one agent offer representation if I switched genres, but I turned her down.
Go check out the rest of the Design Team and enter to win!
Blouse (Esprit), cami (InWear), skirt (Alfred Sung, vintage 80s, consignment), shoes (Hale Bob), all jewelry (Renoir, vintage 50s, Grandma J's cuff and necklace).
"How is it conceivable that all our lauded technological progress--our very civilization--is like the axe in the hand of the pathological criminal?" Albert Einstein
Did I bring food, she asked? I always brought food.
The reason there is only a 16bit/44kHz corrected version and no 24bit/96kHz corrected version is due to my partitions mysteriously disappearing on two external HDs simultaneously last July. I had exported the 1644 version and sent it to Neon just prior to the HDs failing, but had not sent the 2496 version. I was able to restore the partition on the less important drive but not the drive with all my work. I lost a lot of other work as well.
She glanced at me, tilted her head and beamed saying, "I'm growing up." Her face was fair and her tangled locks framed her face. "Afon kept my treasure in a box, " she paused briefly and continued, "I have it with me. Afon will make sure my face looks pretty."
Eventually, after pursuing a half-hearted legal career, I started a Masters Degree in Creative Writing at Sheffield Hallam University, bagged myself an agent pretty soon afterwards, and embarked on the life of a writer of horror stories. Last year, after being challenged by my bookseller friend Deborah Chaffey to write a horror series for kids, I sat down and penned the first Witchfinder book. It was a revelation. Witchfinder is the most fun I’ve ever had as a writer.
You pretend you're not hurt and say you're over it,
The Wizard Blew His Horn
We Americans take strange pride in our byzantine approach to regulations. We have a federal minimum wage, but individual states have their own minimum wages, sometimes special minimum wages for teenagers or part-time workers. One teensy-weensy flaw in our system is that even the federal minimum wage is not a living wage — for anyone not living on their sister’s couch, it leaves you about $6,000 p/a short of what you need to survive.
Look, this idea of going state to state and promising what people want to hear, promising billions, hundreds of billions of dollars to make people happy, that’s what got us into the trouble we’re in now. We’ve got to say no to this kind of spending.
The show starred:
I had so much fun going through all of the freebies on the blog hop last night! I cannot believe the generosity of everyone. It was amazing, thank you to everyone who participated. I became a follower to many new bloggers last night. Don't forget everything on my TpT store is always free. Stop by and take what you want:)
10/3/2008 - New York, NY - WaMu Theater at MSG
I’m not usually someone who’s interested in monasteries. Don’t get me wrong, I’m no philistine; I don’t mind strolling around a church or cathedral for ten minutes admiring the architecture. I don’t get all dewy-eyed at the model crucifix, but I can still appreciate the skill and effort (and hard labour) it takes to conceive and build such a structure.
It’s no secret that I’m sick. I have been for about 3 weeks and some change. Whether it’s allergies or something horrifying like walking pneumonia or mono (thank you, WebMD), I don’t know. It doesn’t help that sleeping through the night is a myth to me. You’d think I was a newborn baby or something but it certainly isn’t ME that isn’t capable of sleeping through the night. My sleep thief goes by the name of Linus aka Stinky aka Sir Streaker.
I decided to visit Montreal’s Botanical Gardens today, only to find it’s closed on Monday’s (until May 15). Although I was unable to visit the greenhouses, access was possible to the Chinese and other themed gardens.
Then, a stunning girl came out onto the ice…
Burn him in a tub of tar,'
Kevin isn’t happy that he has to go and live in Halifax, just because his father has inherited a house from a mysterious man named Angus Seaton. As Kevin copes with living in a new place and dealing with his father’s criticisms, he becomes more and more interested in the mystery of Angus Seaton. Especially after Kevin starts to suspect he’s being haunted. Meanwhile, a second, intertwined story tells of Angus Seaton, a crewman on the Mackay-Bennett, who helped retrieve bodies and identify bodies after the Titantic went down. In the end, Kevin pieces together the story of the inheritance and how it’s connected to Seaton, the Titantic and a young female ghost.
Judy
for I was scared yet I still took a chance
So, how are YOU going to celebrate my Birthday today?
Ghostpoet is one more artist to the group this year that is of the electronic or more urban genre that they’ve been including a lot more in recent years. Supporting fellow nominee on their 2011 tour Metronomy, Ghostpoet is not Tinie Tempah hip-hop though the picture on the cover of the CD may give you that impression. I believe that this guy isn’t for someone like me but not exactly a bad artist. Just not for me. Yes, my least favourite of the pack is still Adele.
The four finalists of the Quaker Chewy Superstar Search will each receive a $1,000 cash prize. Not too shabby, huh? And the Grand Prize winner will get to record a song produced by Nick Jonas, an online music video, a contract with Jonas Group Management and $5,000 in cash! How cool is that?
“So, what I thought all these years was correct. I was nothing to you but a quick and easy way to shed your virginity.” Just saying the words was devastating.
In The Magus, the character Conchis is Klingsor; and in Steppenwolf, Pablo is also Klingsor… the Island that Urfe is on off of Greece is his Castle of Wonders; while Harry Haller experiences the Magic Theatre in France in 1920’s Paris while Nicholas Urfe’s times are post WWII… curious eh?
When I found this I was stitching ornaments on aida and always forgot to get back to it once back on linen/evenweave. But as Im currently back to ornaments but on linen this time I gave it a shot. So far so good. I used this trick on the Noel chart below for starts and ends of threads and see what I feel going forward.
Christians need to start taking a long, painful look at their use of power in the culture and in the Church. Jesus commanded his disciples specifically to not utilize power like the unbelieving world. The fact that Jesus’ coronation ceremony was his beating and crucifixion and that he commands us to take up our cross to follow him points towards the necessity of laying down power, rights and claims to temporal self-justice for something greater. But with the acceptance of cultural norms regarding power, wealth and celebrity (the unholy trinity of American secular religion) into the Church, we are becoming a joke, a punch line and cliché to the dying world in need of a witness for another way.
It also means that Obama donors can easily circumvent federal limits placed on the amount one can donate to a candidate by simply using different names.
As he crossed the room headed for the turbolift, Nik started taking in the details of the area around him, mentally noting things that might help him later. Details like the pile of unconscious dancers and the bloodied little Chandra-fan lying unconscious near the bank of lifts. The general unease that rippled through the place was palpable and he moved through it like a dense fog. Whatever it was that had happened here, the fear of its cause still lingered. A smile slowly pulled at the corner of his lips as Nik realized that this was going to be an interesting job.
This website allows parents and teachers to record themselves reading books.
polyachka: so which part do you care the most – making education more interactive and fun by using technology or giving computers to the developing countries so that they can connect to the world and improve their well-being?
- aaaand study, study, study! (need some better marks)
64. Crime and Punishment - Feodor Dostoyevsky
www.oceanbowl.co.uk
Yes. I have forgotten that I had to pee. Which leads me to my second old-fuck habit…
From the beginning, even when the pain of his absence made it almost impossible to breathe, I’ve trusted my grief to guide me through the days, weeks, months. Despite the insanity of the feelings grief creates, I knew I was sane and well adjusted, and so I felt free to follow the wild and agonizing ride. I’ve learned much these past twenty months on how to survive, how to find sense in the senselessness, how to find peace within the sadness. I’ve found courage, patience, compassion, and a strength I didn’t know I had. I still don’t know where I am going — I can’t see the end of the road. For all I know, there might not be an end. The journey could be all there is.
Heidi was six years older than me and a traffic engineer, having graduated top of her class at U of T. She worked for a downtown firm, had a great apartment in the city and could make THE best fettucine alfredo. Oh, and did I mention she drove a BMW and drove stick? She was originally my brother's friend from summer lifeguarding but she soon saw my potential and took me under her wing. She's since moved to Australia, got married, had three kids and has climbed in her career down under. In short, she's still my hero.
Can we just drop away all our old grudges?
3.How do you walk around?
I know, I know…it’s been quiet in Sparky Land. I knew it might happen, but I thought perhaps a miracle would occur and I’d be able to keep blogging. But now here it is, five days after my last post, and I’m behind on blogging. And email. And Facebook. And sleep. Lawsy, am I ever behind on sleep.
The measurement piece added some math concepts, estimation, measurement, and addition and subtraction.
This made me realise that that is exactly the problem with the ANC. It has been struggling for 100 years. At first the struggle was against apartheid, but since 1994 they are struggling to govern. They struggle to find honest leaders. Many senior ANC officials have been or are currently being prosecuted. They even struggle to find an honest chief of police, failing twice! They struggle to improve education.
Wow! That is the last thing I ever expected! I ran down to tell Terry and said “You may need a drink and sit down before I tell you this..” He was as shocked as I was!
I seriously could not be any happier with how this turned out. I love love LOVE it! Chris was really unsure of the project until we put the books on, and he's thrilled too. The top shelf is his shelf. That's the books that Daddy gets to read to her, since he's the only one that can reach it! I'll try to keep more of the soft / touch books on the bottom shelves to start off with.
We're still listening.
Trixie’s claim to fame is her alleged work in vanquishing the Ursa Major; as told in a star-struck format the crowd is pleased. Given her demonstrated capacities, it isn’t beyond the imagination of most of the audience to suppose that her claim is genuine.
would really
1. I get to be a MOMMY. I get to just love on my two children that kind of get thrown on this crazy teacher train ride that their parents take every year (yes, my husband is also a teacher). They live a teacher's kid life and sometimes that sucks for them. They have to share us with forty-something other children! During the summer..... I am stuck to them like glue.
Just finished another beachscape...this one is 12x24". Nice big size.
Dr. Breaker also co-founded Archemix and BioRelix, which are biotechnology companies.
I’m not just another military wife though. Actually, none of us are. There are things you don’t know about us. Things that you can’t see in twenty seconds on the news or find in a front page photo. There are things that are hidden in the tearful goodbyes and forgotten in the sweet hellos. I am more than a bumper sticker, a red t-shirt, a northeast accent and a longing for good coffee. We all are and really, I just want you to see that.
Well, life and morality and governance, adequate citizenship, are not about "the chase." Just as having a spiritual life is not about making up your mind once and for all. True spirituality is present, it's alive and observant.
Waiting for my husband to come into the house. Sometimes I get excited and wait for him by the door. I knew my daughter was taking a picture, so I pulled the shirt a bit to show the gun really does not print.
most recently, decided to take advantage of the improving conditions of the market,” said Mr. Cohen. There is no price for the site, and bids are preliminarily due Nov. 22.
It's a real garden of Eden, elderberries (my favourite), wild cherries, wild gooseberries, blackberries, wild apples, sloe berries, wild plums (to name a few) and at least a half dozen or so edible mushrooms such as the field mushroom, ink cap, parasol, puffball etc (sadly we missed the seasonal fruiting of morels and St George's mushrooms which only occur early in Spring. The Spring drought has all but obliterated the mycelium from fruiting. But, as we've had some rain the last two weeks, I'm hoping to catch a few lazy St Georges making a late appearances tomorrow morning!)
There are three things that I will go to my death fighting for. One: God, Two: Family, Three: America. Now if anyone messes with these three things or disses on them in any way, it will set a “sleeping lion” off in me like none other.
Well yes, as a matter of fact, there was a day 2 to BlogHer, and I will give you a rundown with links one of these days, but so much has been happing since then that obviously I have been rather busy. For instance, we had Sweet Pea's 5th birthday party the weekend following BlogHer, we went on a mad house hunt, put in an offer which was neither accepted nor even countered, missed out on another of my favorites, and nearly offered on a really lovely custom home in an ubelievably gorgeous neighborhood, then stopped everything due to Slipshod's research and consequent belief that the housing market is bound to drop lots more over the next year or two.
If you want to access my Twitter account, you can find the link at the bottom of the right side of each page of the blog.
-Psylocke tells Fantomex that what they had was a one night stand and absolutely nothing else. Fantomex is devastated.
KEVIN SHIELDS : guitars, voice
and overheard—I don't know, something about dying?
Food cravings: none
The Islamic fundamentalist sect, Boko Haram, has threatened to attack PUNCH and six newspapers, all based in the South. The sect issued the threats in an 18-minute video posted on Youtube.
Perhaps as a cruel joke from the gods, I also came out queer, mildly autistic, and non-Christian.
Christine Okken
I know I shouldn't wish my life away, but I love it when it hits the end of the week and I can just chill. Today I have the last polish in the Boots 17 Spring nail collection - Spring Petal.
We booked (after again, a TON of price comparing on expedia, orbitz, kayak and cheaptickets.com) a one bedroom suite at The Reserve at The Paradisus Palma Real Resort, an All Inclusive Resort about 20 minutes from the Punta Cana airport.
The advice they give in the video above is true for any dream profession: you have to go out and do things to help you get ahead, because if you don’t, other, more motivated people will and they will will leave you behind in the dust! (Ira Glass gives similar advice)
Make sure you stop by Sentimental Sundays....There is a little surprise for you!!
I went to the Fabric Depot in Oregon for that fabric. My sis-in-law Lurlyn and I love to shop there whenever we have an itch for a project. I don't remember the name and maker of the fabric, but if anyone needs to know, I'm sure I can do a little research.
If I live to 50: TJ will be 24, Tyler will be 22, Jake will be 19, and Becky and Billy will be 30 days from turning 18 when I turn 50.
As you have already probably deduced, at theLOOKes we love colour, and this new look is no different. We have combined a mint green dress, courtesy of Mango, with a peach blazer, which despite seeming like too much of a contrast, complements and favours the dress perfectly.
I sense a children's film here.
"The universe works with you and for you. It is not your enemy."
3) click
‘This will eliminate the need for women to stay in waiting areas.’It didn't occur to you to do this before..?
He wondered who had told her about him.
“It'll be fine.”
Rrs usually stains.
in these fleeting moments,
Ok, so why am I so mad?!?! Because I called it when it happened? No. Because I can vaguely recall a similar experience? No. I'm mad because no one gets it!!! He can walk, he talk, he probably won't need surgery, and hell...I'm sure he can still play a damn good game of hockey! But what about everything else this star athlete has going on that will be effected?!!? Will he remember standing proudly as the National Anthem played that night? Will he remember what period he was in when he got hit? Had they scored yet?
Nabokov wrote his novels on index cards – they would then be paper-clipped together and stored in wee boxes. In the Paris Review he said he liked lined Bristol cards and well-sharpened, not too hard, pencils capped with erasers. We call erasers rubbers in these here parts. Which could cause all kinds of confusion and does cause all kinds of sniggering in classrooms around the country.
And flash mobs.
In a Better World lifts up a simple tale of two schoolboys, essentially having good moral values, who are both missing their respective mothers, deteriorate into modern terrorists or young vigilantes. The power of the film does not lie in the story line—it is undeniably a simple, predictable one. The power of the film lies in default by what the film suggests to the viewer by presenting the simple tale. Do “caring” parents really care for their children? Are the parents there during critical moments when they are needed the most?
I could barely name any of his songs, was indifferent to his music videos which were staples on MTV, but I did know one thing for sure….
West quickly pointed out that the Koran was written long before America even existed and that it does indeed tell believers to kill infidels, and then proceeded to chronicle a lengthy list of historical Muslim acts of aggression. Congressman West closed his retort by referencing the Fort Hood shootings and 9-11 attacks, saying that his first hand experiences on the battlefield has given him insight into the tactics that Islamists use before telling Hamze not to “try to blow sunshine up my butt” with his criticism of him. West took offense to Hamze’s amateurish criticism of his stance on radical Islam and concluded by telling Mr. Hamze to “put the microphone down and go home.”
Yes, that’s me…still.
I have very fond memories of this treat, an open-faced sandwich that is simple, and simply delicious. My school hours were in the morning, so I would be back home for lunch, but my parents would always pack me a filling snack for the mid-morning break. This toast would find its way into my tiffin-box fairly often, and it was always enjoyed down to the last bite. A variety of veggies are mixed together into a filling, using some shredded cheese and boiled potato to hold them together. The mixture is patted on to sliced bread and then toasted on a skillet. When the filling is face down, the cheese melts and browns with beautiful results. The onion, carrrot and peppers in the filling don't need to be cooked, of course, but I like to steam-cook the beans, cauliflower and peas slightly (a minute in the microwave is perfect). I also use the microwave to cook the potato quickly and with the minimum amount of water (prick the potato all over with a fork, then wash well, wrap loosely in a sheet of paper towel, and microwave for 3-5 minutes, turning once or twice in between).
The nurse checked me and I was 4cm and 75% effaced (so I didnt really change any from the day before). They tried to start an IV and I started to feel very nauseous. I really thought I was going to throw up. I was dizzy and just didnt feel good. My sweet nurses put cold wash cloths on my head and tried to help me feel better, but it didn't work. They ended up giving me some Zofran.
Except that waiting is not the same as doing nothing, nor is it the same as hanging around at home. Waiting creates a sub-species of stress, based around being ready to spring into action at very short notice. Think of fighter pilots sitting in their jets at the end of the runway waiting for the call to scramble - sure, they're idling, but relaxed they're not.
advertising deals with
I will keep my practice of having meditation/prayer/quiet time for a couple hours. (I've been leaving Friday mornings blank on my calendar for a few years now for this reflection time. It was really hard to do at first, and even hard to imagine--a couple hours in my schedule not available for work or appointments?? Thank goodness my friend and teacher Sage convinced me to try it. I think it's had a really good effect on my sense of well being, and certainly on my health. I still work about 60 hours a week, but for a couple hours every week, with the house to myself and plenty of quiet, I get peaceful, go inward, and breathe...)
The little decorating I get to do has been a sigh of relief here and there. It keeps me from insanity. I picked up this subway art at Hobby Lobby for 50% off this weekend and a cute pillow that somehow ended up being $1.50. I was so excited about the great deals I got.
“’Sorry I’m late!’ shouted Nancy one day, as she rushed into a café to meet her.
Here's three items we've hung using a French Cleat and eash installation took less than 10 minutes:
Enough for 2 drinks
“They’ll travel on land until they find suitable nesting habit,” says Kathryn Harrison, species at risk biologist for the RBG. “The problem is that they will try to cross roads and it is your adult, mature females that are ones that tend to cross.”
1 Children, obey your parents in the Lord, for this is right.
A fire can purge, fuse, or free us. Fire can give us light to help us see, give us heat to make us warm, or unleash energy to provide us a comfortable lifestyle. The flames might be controlled or might be a destructive force gone wild. Fire can be many things but hopefully we are never burned by it.
Generating savings through the closure of these inefficient facilities — or dangerously under-staffed facilities — will allow for additional investments in the state's cost-efficient and public safety-focused diversion infrastructure without necessitating that new prisons replace closed facilities down the road.
Me "No we cant your mad"
As I was wondering whether or not I should make a trip into town to find some free WiFi so I could share this luscious torte with you, I got the best birthday surprise ever! My son, daughter in law and grandson drove all the way from Texas to surprise me for my birthday! (Insert tears and an extremely happy Mimi here.) And since they've been here, I have to admit that I haven't missed my computer a bit. We've been spending time together and having loads of fun. I mean, who could miss their internet when they've got Sherlock Jones to hang out with? Seriously.
We went to that church for almost a year and a half. By the time we left, I thought there was something terribly wrong with me. We had been living in Portland for a year and ahalf, attending a church ocnsistently, and trying hard to make friends. And not succeeding. At that point, I could say I was truly friends with two people and we didn't see them often.
Second, I am not criticising the RHS. My point was to suggest that, while the RHS was looking at making changes, it might like to make public the judges' comments on why each garden was given a particular award. This was not because I personally think there is any skulduggery going on. I just think it would be interesting.
A few days later I was taking a brisk walk / buying a newspaper / checking the weather. It was only down the road so I left my slippers on and took a cup of tea with me. Passing a bus stop I heard someone say ‘That’s a good idea.’ I looked up and came face to face with the village’s self-appointed traffic warden. We struck up a conversation and I was informed that he was on the way to see his grandson.
And Where has Indiana Jones been????
“Moo-oom,” hisses one 11 year old, “I know they’re serving snacks, it’s not like I can’t see you know. No! I don’t want any! Moo-ooom!” It’s curious that the snacks are wolfed down by the mothers, while most of the kids say no; only 12 or 14 years old and already so horribly conscious of their appearance. And all of them are of course dressed in “regulation uniform” – skinny leg jeans, ballerinas or boots, and long hair.
The clock is ticking for the biggest U.S. banks to revamp their foreclosure practices. Under orders from U.S. regulators, 14 financial institutions have until mid-June to lay out plans to clean up their mortgage-servicing operations – and another 60 days to make the changes.
Fullers London Porter 5.0%
Astounded by the most mundane
-was pissed. i saw 5 hot hippies in between no one who looked like aika, for almost 45 mins.
The pleasure is when you use your hands, arms, thighs, knees and feet to steer.
~Hubert van Zeller
me and veronica!
While I knew that Jules and Jim originated as a novel by Henri-Pierre Roché, it wasn't until I obtained the Criterion edition that I learned that Roché loosely based it on his relationship with Franz Hessel, a German writer who translated Proust into German (as Jim does in the film) and Helen Grund, who became Hessel's wife and herself translated Vladimir Nabokov's Lolita into German. Legend has it that Roché also introduced Gertrude Stein to Pablo Picasso through his original career as an art dealer and art collector. Though the circles that Roché circulated in preceded the time period of Woody Allen's recent Midnight in Paris, he did know many of the literary and artistic figures depicted in Allen's fantasy. The real-life coincidences that brought Truffaut and Roché together border on the extraordinary. Truffaut stumbled upon the novel in a secondhand bookstore and it led to a letter-writing relationship between himself and Roché where the young critic Truffaut promised that if he ever made movies, he would bring Jules and Jim to the screen. Jules and Jim was the first novel that Roché ever wrote — which he did at the age of 74. His second novel, also autobiographical, Two English Girls and the Continent, eventually became the source material of a later Truffaut film, Two English Girls. Two English Girls, sort of the inverse of Jules and Jim with two women pining for the same man, marks its 40th anniversary this year but unfortunately, like too many other great films I'd like to write about this year, no proper DVD copy has been made for rental or at a reasonable price, the same situation that in the past two years has befallen other films such as Steven Soderbergh's Kafka, Barbet Schroeder's Barfly with its great performances by Mickey Rourke and Faye Dunaway and two of John Sayles' very best films — City of Hope and Matewan. Who said only old classics become lost films? With the constant format changes, some never made the leap from pan-and-scanned VHS. A true travesty, but I've digressed from the subject at hand. Roché didn't live long enough to see the movie of his first novel, but the film version brought best-seller status to his book that it never saw in his lifetime. One aspect that didn't occur to me until I re-watched the movie for this tribute: Not only has the film reached its 50th anniversary this year, 2012 also means a full century has passed from where its story begins in 1912.
Next we visited the local school. It was less flash, much bigger with less art and the kids seemed a bit less controlled. But the kids who showed us round were happier and had loads of fun things to tell us and seemed to know lots of the younger kids and all of the teachers. All good points. There were kids of every deomgraphic in the community and I liked that, along with the fact that the kids all live within a mile of the school. But of course there were downsides:
2. Survival is your priority not having luxuries. I don’t care if you like chocolate, video games, or shooting things, you need to survive so get your priorities strait. This includes Water, food, and medicine.
Anyway let me know which way you want to go and I will suggest some stitches we could practice.
With the sleigh full of toys, and St. Nicholas too.
9:00 PM: Sleep
Keiko Kitagawa with co-star
Libraries needn’t be grand. The castle was eventually replaced by an old warehouse, which offered space and parking, and didn’t seem to cramp Curious George’s style–just like kids, he’s curious anywhere. For a while, a children’s branch anchored a shopping center. And Tuesday mornings in summer, I peddled my pink Schwinn to Rose Park to meet the bookmobile, emptied my twin bike baskets, and filled them up again. The ride home was uphill, but my excitement made the ride easier.
Watch in-game footage of Wipeout on the PS Vita as we race Unity Square in a Feisar Fighter:
Similar events have happened on a smaller scale within WoW itself. Perhaps some veterans reading this once had a Hogger experience that’s reminiscent of the above. In all cases, we hate to see the richest and most memorable moments ironed out in the name of the perfectly smooth, straightforward gaming experience. But events that are unexpected, unusual, or or otherwise “imperfect” prevent the game from being sterile. When the game is too perfect, each quest leading to another that you know in advance won’t present any new challenge, you can follow directions and go through the motions as much as you like, but nothing will ever stand out or be remembered.
Because I can only do so much and really have no control of how my niece is parented by her parents I feel impotent to intervene with her and on her behalf. More than anything I am afraid that her electronic life is going to horrifically derail her future life. These kids have no concept of how they are presenting themselves to the world and quite literally they are putting their whole lives out there for judgement...they have no sense that what they write on these HEINOUS "networking" sites can be damaging to them in far reaching ways.
Within the last week, it came to my attention that a better source for the Soundcheck had surfaced. Listening to it, I was shocked over how much better the new source was over the muddled recording that had been floating around in the hands of collectors for 30 years. And even more interesting, the new source came from Russian with love, and not from the UK or elsewhere. Fage, a JDC member, provided the Soundcheck for this post. Of the two songs in the Soundcheck, “Ceremony” really shines. The Soundcheck is night and day to any other source, which is a testament to how talented Fage is when it comes to audio restoration.
But all kidding aside, I understand this one. If you work for the most powerful man in the free world, (Obama, not Biden), you don’t go “acting up” when you are representing him, nor the fine people of the United States of America. Especially among other people in other countries, for goodness sake!
them can be together as a family. I love this photo of Andrea Jeanne. I think
3-E x e r c i s e. No, not the let's go and join the gym thing. Maybe just some some yogurt and Kung Pao to start.
on a bright sunny February day
You are what you read. Trashy romance novels? Congratulations. You’re a trashy romantic. Probably.
Yes, we soothe our children to sleep every night with stories of wicked stepmothers/sisters, witches, wolves, evil queens, giants, and the like. I mean, Bambi’s mamma gets shot by a hunter, Little Red Riding Hood is chased by a wolf who wants to eat here, Snow White and Cinderella had to deal with wicked stepmothers, and the 3 Little Pigs had a big bad wolf huffing and puffing trying to blow their house down!
The book could also be about sucking the power of childhood away from kids when they hit the ripe, old age of 13. Ok, maybe the number is just a random one, chosen by the author it is the age most kids think about as the entry point to pseudo-adulthood. We do call 13-year-olds "young adults." Maybe Cody is trying to say that by immersing this age group in many of the events and conundrums our generation faced at a much older age, we are taking away the power of childhood. I don't know. As an adult, that's what I thought of while I read the book. I would be interested to hear your takes on the book. Let me know.
The trouble with Madalyn was that she needlessly alienated a whole lot of people, many of them atheists. She saw herself as the epitome of what a self-respecting atheist was supposed to be, and if you had a less confrontative vision, she considered you a coward. Because of her harshness, one of her followers founded The Freedom from Religion Foundation, which is now much larger than American Atheists. Another problem with Madalyn was that when she died, her organization nearly folded. That’s just how it is with personality-dominated groups.
Now this week Yapta unveiled FareIQ for corporate travel managers, which they describe as “the corporate travel industry’s only independent airfare price tracking solution.”
5. approx. 10-20% about your personal life experiences, comments on world events, your hobbies, etc. keeping everything mostly upbeat even when you complain – people are put off by “Debbie Downers” and you lose that know/like/trust factor quickly. It’s okay to share about yourself – that’s keeping it real.
so fun!
On the flip-side, I would like to ask those of you out there to say a quick prayer for my baby cousin. He was just diagnosed with Leukemia a few weeks ago. He's not even 2 yet. He's go A LOT of people pulling and praying for him, but more prayers will never hurt!
Or you survive when I in earth am rotten;
If you’d like to watch the whole interview, or to enjoy our other Executive Insights videos, you can subscribe to Soundview Executive Book Summaries. All editions include the monthly video interviews. And we’d love to hear back about what you’re learning as well.
Mr. Geithner, speaking on CNN’s “State of the Union,” said the GOP idea would be just a short-term solution to the current budget impasse and that President Barack Obama’s “preference, still” is to reach a bigger agreement to reduce the budget deficit and raise the government’s $14.29 trillion borrowing limit through 2012.
Chips manufactured using CMOS (Complementary Metal-Oxide Semiconductor) technology form the basis of many consumer electronic devices used in daily life such as personal computers, smart phones, high definition TV and game consoles.
God, the perfect wisdom of all, *
neighboring Plateau’s 14%
She wasn't an immigrant, though, and she didn't have to work in a factory. And while it's nice to have the touchstone of my grandmother's full and happy childhood to reflect upon, it's the other girls of her generation that crowd my mind today.
Cricut Everyday Paper Dolls (Leaves)
How do I feel
“There will be terrible times in the last days. People will be…abusive, unholy, slanderous, without self-control, brutal, lovers of pleasure, not lovers of good or God…Have nothing to do with them.”
03 The Meaning of Soul
Role: Secondary main character, antagonist
Today I'm thankful for the periods of time that cement close friendships.
City officials say municipal telecom service is an economic development strategy that will increase competition and provide high-speed Internet access to those who lack any kind of broadband. They point out that local governments traditionally provide public services – water, sewer, electric, natural gas, transportation – where the options are nonexistent or inadequate.
That being said, I’ll probably still be irrationally glued to my TV until way past my bedtime.
Ella is 5 months and 1 week old. She weighs 20.8 pounds. She's fee-at. ( Can you say Hulk Baby?). She's also te-all. I don't know how tall because she won't be still long enough for me to find out.
Those times are long gone. These days Manchester City is a competitive team (yes, Manchester City… CITY) and the working class, salt of the earth folk I grew up with and love have gone from being this:
“One morning, after a sleepless night worrying over what I could do to straighten myself out, I went to my room alone—took my Bible in hand and asked Him, the One Power, that I might open to a good place to read—and I read ‘For I delight in the law of God after the inward man. But I see a different law in my members, warring against the law of my mind and bringing me into captivity under the law of sin which is in my members. Wretched man that I am! Who shall deliver me out of the body of this death.’
Today, I've been dying to share with you my very own simple Baked Parmesan Herb Crusted Pork served with home-made cold potato salad. Something so simple and bursting with flavours. Also, you could save some baked Parmesan herb crusted pork aside and have them for another meal. This baked pork is good to serve as a sandwich too. Have a ciabatta, spread some mix honey dill mustard and light mayo with squeeze of lemon juice, then couple dash of Tabasco and serve in on a bed fresh of lettuce.
- Anne Curtis, the recording artist. As i tweeted the other night, ‘You can’t get away with it. Unless you’re Anne Curtis.’
My oldest was a little sad but we still have about 4 cocoons left and that comforted her. I’m hoping the last few pick a nice warm week in which to emerge so we can let them out right away.
A super fast desert that you will almost definitely have the ingredients for in the store cupboard! The topping can be anything you like from syrup, treacle, jam or lemon curd. Add slices of lemon to the golden syrup or coco powder to the sponge for a chocolate pudding.
So we are to “enter into our closet” and “shut the door.”
Oh love is time
Well, certainly some headaches, since all of my heroes are alpha, lol. I’d say that I have two challenges with this. One is not going overboard with the alpha personality because the hero certainly can’t be cruel or obnoxious. The other is the need to create different types of alphas for each story, so that means coming up with a variety of heroes that are intrinsically different, yet still alpha.
Caitlin Flanagan is, perhaps, best known for her book To Hell With All That and this is her latest in her series of dithering, except that instead of targeting mothers (both stay at home moms AND moms that have jobs outside the home as well as being a mom), she targets our tween and teenage daughters. I think that more specifically, she's looking at girls that are on the cusp of getting their first periods and maybe a little bit older (because she does look at people like Patty Hearst in addition to teenagers).
Weight too great, climb up outta this chasm.
rock and roll in storybook disquise...
“The feeling within Occupy Wall Street is that people that created the collapse, namely bankers, were helped out, and the people affected by it like homeowners who got foreclosed upon… weren’t helped.”
I believe He will then show us the “Signs….
They didn't even look at it, though they were in the same room! One of them mumbled, "Uh, we have to go."
these 40 weeks went so fast, time is just going to fly by with a baby in the house. i will be grateful for the company.
We ask Allah to bestow grace upon our nation, and to make this lesson one from which all our people can benefit, as well as the rulers – those deaf who cannot hear, those blind who cannot see, and those madmen who cannot heed reason. We would like these people to benefit from this lesson, to open their eyes the better to see, to open their ears the better to hear, and to open their minds the better to understand. There is a lesson to be learned from this major event.
Then maybe we will leave goose bumps to their real use–telling us when to put on a coat.
She shrugs.
The cabbie let us take time to take some pictures.
She deserved a party in behalf of her favorite person on earth, wouldn't ya say?
Overall, this is an excellent book and one I would recommend to anyone who is thinking of writing a memoir, even if it is just to give to your grandchildren!
Thelonious Dub is an instrumental trio founded by guitarist Joe Bartone in 2007. They play a unique mix of improvised jazz, dub reggae and jam band styles or as they like to joke "a complete misunderstanding of both jazz and reggae.” Joe is supported by John von Seggern on bass and Sean Rainey on drums. They are frequently joined on gigs by various friends and guests on sax, guitar and other instruments.
I am so excited. I have made it 2 days with out ice cream. This is HUGE for me right now. My addiction was full blown again. I knew it was out of control when I bought 4 pints of Ben & Jerry's and ate them all in 3 days. Sooooo bad!!
I went to my first spin class on Sunday. All of my friends have raved about the classes and how much I'll love it. I woke up bright and early Sunday morning to go to my first class at 9:15. Now this is huge for me, because I am not a morning person, and Sunday's are made for sleeping in.
1 1/2 cups powdered sugar, sifted
Congratulations and kudos to one of our valued clients, FGL Sports & Sport Chek for their innovative use of Social Media to recruit top talent!
I'm a little behind on Alice Anne's 18 month post. She had her check-up last week and did great. Dr. Moore said she looked fabulous! She's growing like a weed and her vocabulary gets bigger and bigger every day. She's really started talking a lot the last week or two. Her favorite things to say right now are, "Mamma, rook" (look). She brings something to me about every 30 seconds and proudly tells me to look. She also loves it when I ask her to go get something or go do something...she proudly marches back over to me and says, "I didid" or "I godid" (I did it and I got it). I love listening to her talk!! I love hearing her call me. She says, "Moooooommy, R U?" She LOVES to give huge bear hugs and loves to say, "I Yu You." She knows all of her body parts, sounds that all the animals make, and LOVES playing in her shoe drawer. She could literally sit at her shoe drawer for 45 minutes and just try on all her shoes.
RECOMMENDATION: If you liked Bee Movie, you should watch this just to see the similarities. If you were a fan of the original “Joe’s Apartment” MTV sketch, then you might want to watch this for the sake of completism. If cockroaches make you cringe (as they do I) — you might want to watch this just to see something you hate being played off as “cute”. It’s an interesting juxtaposition.
Please see above for the latest pricing increase from Raider, which have risen approximate $100/€100/£50 over the past twelve months. At the start of the year Raider International Publishing opened their first brick and mortar bookstore in Suffern, New York. There have also been reports of delays from authors on agreed publishing dates. Raider continue to offer an expedited publishing service for $299. Expect a six month publishing process.
If you are looking for a different sort of Amish—a historical, instead of contemporary—then THE HEART’S FRONTIER is a book you might want to consider. It is interesting, and it held my attention all the way to the end. I never would have thought of mixing Amish and the Wild West—but it worked for these two talented authors. Discussion questions and an exerpt from the next book in this series, A Plain and Simple Heart is included at the end of the book. $13.99. 296 pages.
1/4 cup butter softened
But your domain provider’s Web site will have a simple method to check almost instantly. Web hosts – those with the computing power to “host” your site and all its inner working on the Web – commonly offer domain names as part of their basic package. To find one that meets your needs and budget, search online for “domain hosts.” Or start with one of these:
Painting by Numbers in Acrylics on canvas board from a photograph
Any woman can become a tragic heroine like Ana if she gives in to a secret longing that has no realistic outlet or satisfaction. Written in the tradition of my favorite nineteenth-century novels, Anna Karenina and Madame Bovary–but with a contemporary psychological twist–The Seducer shows that true love can be found in our ordinary lives rather than in flimsy fantasies masquerading as great passions.
Nothing can beat, ROYAL ENFIELD
Some of the pics in this collection are available elsewhere on the web, but a whole bunch of them look to be the result of this fan’s efforts to restore images from the aforementioned film clips (I have an envelope with some of those, myself, but none of them are this sweet). This is a true labor of love. If you’re as big a geek for the original show as I am, you’re gonna love taking this little field trip.
Staring at screens.
Let me get the bad out of the way first. The trip to Virginia Beach was LONG. Even though we left a little bit before 10PM, we didn't arrive until sometime after 1PM. The funny thing is that my dad actually told me that we made good progress by departing at the time we did. By leaving during the night hours, far less people were on the road. Of course we still weren't spared the curse of idiot drivers. Some crazy lady merging on the highway nearly ran my dad and I off the road.
‘But he’s married. Didn’t he marry some female novelist or other?’
Wrap Up
Scruggs’ style of three-finger picking influenced banjo players everywhere. Here are two clips from the old days. I love how he bends the notes in the first clip by adjusting the tuning pegs:
I need to take a step back. Find some joy in learning again. At least for a few days, avoid the source of stress. Be available to answer their questions. Say "yes" to art, and cooking, and music, and science experiments. Don't stress that because we didn't do much academic work last week because of the big rearrange/tidy up and know that it will come in good time?
☺ Find HERE YOUR ETSY USERNAME, and write instead of it exactly only your Etsy username. You can see these buttons in the image (where is written "knotme"): they will lead you to the Craftcult's Heart-o-Matic, and the Craftopoly's Treasury Hunt.
In this fast-paced world, physicians, dentists, attorneys, investment bankers and other high-income executives are often content to believe that they’ve pur­chased a guaranteed, sustained income stream that will automatically kick in should they ever become disabled. Fre­quently, these clients are short on time when they purchase the policy and avoid reading the fine print on spot or familiar­izing themselves with the contingencies of their coverage—despite the fact that they often have multiple policies with yearly payouts well in excess of a half-million dollars!
(Click to enlarge)
This is one of my current favourite songs (and videos) It’s INSANELY great!
It might not always win friends. Nobody likes candor or truth, no matter how much they posture to the contrary. We have grown too soft to appropriately handle the brutality of this approach. While it is possible to recover and move on, it will cause a moment of reeling back and stuttering. “Bwububuwha? Oh. Okay.”
Penny expertly juggles several disparate threads over the course of her novels. One of those threads that comes to the forefront in this book is that of the strained marriage of Peter and Clara Morrow. They are both artists living in Three Pines, but Clara has always subsumed her artistic endeavors, relinquishing her time and talent to Peter's, which is considered to be more saleable. Unspoken resentment and jealousy curdle below the surface when Clara, who's been sculpting and painting in obscurity for 25 years, is suddenly "discovered" and given a one woman gallery show of her own.
I got to play with the lovely La Blanche stamps, met some super people and got asked back next year.... can't have done that badly then can I???
It’s a fascinating piece of work produced by Jonny Pipe, interspersing music with personal stories and observations. It is all pretty frank and honest stuff:
Some may call it an unfair judgement having not given the whole film a proper chance but I think it’s fairly clear why I gave up after about twenty minutes. There was no originality, the actors were rather 2D and uninspired, and the whole sequence I saw seemed like a poor man’s remake of Cameron’s version.
“Iba talaga ang timpla ng dinugas na kape!!!!”
An invisible thread of kindliness drew her to people who expected the least and needed the most.
Ms. Bluestocking, please contact me at magemanda AT gmail DOT com with your postal address and the book of your choice so that I can send out your prize *smiles*
I hate looking at supplements for people and for horses. I start thinking about all the things he needs, all the htings he could be getting, the areas he needs improvement in, and then the options, the options! For every problem area there ar 50 solutions you could choose, and how to you really discover the best one? Which ones do you really need, and how much are they going to help?
Thro’ Him that redeemed us!
He generally has a picnic in the park after school on a Friday which means I can’t attend as I work late that night.
(Lights out. Narrator and all the characters except the three servants exit.)
and who you held in your light and nourished and shone the way forward.
I can't wait for the next chapter of beer swap, it's a brilliant concept and looks to be even better next time around. It would be superb if it could be made an international endeavour in the future with local beers flying back and forth all over the globe. So, if anyone can think of a clever way of getting round the huge shipping charges, be sure to make it known.
“Because it’s the first time I’ve managed to get a word in edgeways.”
BridgePort Brewing Company / BridgePort Brewpub + Bakery Hop Czar
Vinegar Mixture:
Journal of Intellectual Property Law & Practice (2011), doi: 10.1093/jiplp/jpr088, first published online: June 9, 2011
But baby don't give up on me,
Following are the five major Pilgrimages of Rajasthan-
I’m quite late with this, but better late than never… The sun has been very shy here lately, hiding behind heavy watery clouds. The few times that it did come out, it was probably because I didn’t have my camera with me.
And like every great writer, having dedicated so much of her life to the creation of art she is struck by the most paralysing question of all about her belief in its validity: 'What if I had been wrong?'
Akshardham Temple – It is a recently built Hindu temple complex. The temple is famous for its marvelous and magnificent art and architecture. The place is getting popularity in the map of Indian tourism.
Christmas In Connecticut (1992) ... GMC ... 1 PM
She has set her place in the traditional manner on the ground.
After having just gotten your new Blu-ray DVD Player, you will obviously be excited about testing it out. No doubt you will be anxious to see the glorious 1080p picture and High Definition sound quality. So the question is this: how to set up your new Blu-ray player to get the highest possible performance from it? Will it be as simple as connecting your DVD player? Will it be a breeze?
Here it is all finished sitting pretty in my living room.
Oatmeal Raisin Cookie
Thank you for being a part of my darkest day and more importantly, the sunshine that followed.
I spent years in therapy trying to understand my own actions. You know what I came up with? It wasn't me. It wasn't co-dependency or a fault in my own upbringing. It just happened.
So am I saying that we should love God and our neighbor and we don't have to worry about going and "making disciples of every nation."
As for me, I intend to focus my blog on more ‘boring’ things now. I have a couple of really cool conferences lined up for the next couple of weeks and I intend to tweet from them and perhaps even put up some posts from the road.
The entire documentary is done using this same technique; where instead of a narrator; selected pieces of film are used to reveal truth; usually in the form of contradicting a previous piece of film (that you thought was true). It’s a very effective technique to NOT have a narrator and instead let your film do the talking and let the viewer sort it out.
Die-cut cardstock to size and fold to form card base. Attach patterned paper to inside of card base. Die-cut Scallop Circle Pop-Up from patterned paper and attach to card. Die-cut several Swirl #2 out of cardstock and attach to the base of the card. Die-cut a heart (from Frame, Scallop & Heart) out of patterned paper, embellish with appliqué flowers and attach to the card. Die-cut several Butterfly #15 out of patterned paper, embellish with threaded buttons and attach to the card. Fore more interest, adhere small flowers behind the butterflies. Die-cut Phrase, Celebrate #3 out of cardstock and attach to the card. Cut two strips of patterned paper to fit across the card front and adhere in place. Die-cut Flower & Vine and Swirls #2 out of cardstock and patterned paper. Layer shapes and attach to the card front. Embellish with threaded button. Add a rub ons sentiment.
“It is very important that there be no obstacle to the acquisition of items with technological content,” Celso Amorim told the daily Folha de Sao Paulo on April 23.
So I sprayed the dirt, the spiders died, but more came to the surface. I’m assuming that in the dirt there were spider eggs, and when I was watering the plants and giving them lots of sunshine I was also helping these spider eggs grow up nice and healthy with no predators to eat them.
Year 2012! WOW!
rumours circulating that Prophet prophesied the
I've been journaling my thoughts about the trip, what we did each day and what I learned, how I felt. It's a slow process and I try to process it all and get it down on paper. but as I write I will copy it on here for you to see. A journal of my time in Panama. Stories of what He has done, what He is doing.
Lill: Oh they do – as my roommate – but not as the desperate premature cougar after their baby boy.
Tracey Cordaro of North Las Vegas said the sighting "took my breath away." "It was amazing," she said. "It looked as if it was disintegrating rapidly, but was still quite large when it disappeared from my view ... (It was) bright green, visible in the bright sunlight."
Shockingly, parting from widespread public ignorance, Hill actually acknowledged two of the three necessary components of determining natural born citizenship as being place of birth and citizenship status of both parents. However, she argued that, “No law in New Jersey obligated him (Obama) to produce any such evidence in order to get on the primary ballot.”
2) The More-Than-Obvious Scorsese Connection - It is certainly no secret that Martin Scorsese is one of the biggest influences on PTA's career, but it is more evident in Boogie Nights than anywhere else in the auteur's oeuvre, and the most obvious Scorsese-influenced connection is to the master's 1990 modern day masterpiece Goodfellas. From the rags to riches and back to rags story arc of Goodfellas' Henry Hill and Boogie Nights' Dirk Diggler to the ever-roaming, ever-moving camera of both films, the long, always-sharp-eyed tracking shots, Anderson shows his prowess as a filmmaker while also honoring his stylistic mentor with a hot-blooded homage. To watch as Wahlberg's wouldbe porn icon weaves his way through clubs and pool parties and recording studios is like watching Ray Liotta leading a wide-eyed, bewildered Lorraine Bracco through the back passages of the Copacabana in Goodfellas. Great stuff indeed.
I was given a book of love poems (Shelley) when I was a teen. My response then was ... YUCK! Thirty+ years later, my opinion hasn't changed much. I'm not a big fan of love poetry, but I am a big fan of odes. I enjoy reading about the things people obsess over. I could read poems about birds, a favorite pencil, dad's chair, and lots of other things you can name, over and over. So, while I'm not about the mushy, heartfelt, loving another human being desperately, kind of poem, I do appreciate other kinds of love.
Math – Caleb did some review work and took a test. He then began a new light unit and worked on multiplying by 5 and choosing the nearest ten and thousands place.
Instructions on Christian Doctrine: the Sacrament of the Holy Eucharist
I wanted to leave you with a few links to articles I came across this week in my research that have been HIGHLY informative, in different ways and in different areas of interest.
What side is Renard on? Are there factions of Grimm or Wesen? Is there a war being waged? So cryptic!! What do you think of Rosalee and Monroe? Poor Hank, where is that storyline going and do you think Hank is in any immediate danger? Is Wu now cray-cray? Juliette = useless? Discuss away!
He knocks.
Ring:: Kohl's
I'm opening this up to anyone who feels so inclined to do this on their blog (someone pretty please).
NO. NO. NOT, BOSTON, FECKEN’ MAINE.
Once you can hear the sound like the rice is jumping up........
Sept 11 – Mojoe’s Rock House – Tinley Park, IL (W/Valencia)
4: Sending Christmas cards
And I think that’s the point I would make here. Going around and promising a whole bunch of new ideas and new projects and big ideas — that was fine. And maybe we need it; we can do that. I supported the doubling of the National Institutes of Health. But we didn’t have a $1.2 trillion deficit. We didn’t — we weren’t at over — we are now going to reach $16 trillion, which is more than our whole GDP. We were not in that situation 20, 15 years ago.
When writing a novel, do you outline the entire plot before beginning, or do you like to let the characters guide you?
I suppose I’m not the easiest person to love. I’m flawed, perhaps not on the surface, but still waters run deep. I can’t say I’m more deserving of love than someone else. I’ve done things in my past of which I’m ashamed. Sadly I haven’t always learnt my lesson but I’m trying. I’ve experienced events in my past that trouble me to this day. I would like to say I’ve learnt the art of forgiveness but sometimes I catch the demons whispering in my ear. The reality is you can’t runaway from your past, you have to find a way to learn to live with it.
Card Stock: Dies to Die For - Kraft
The author finds a ton of ways to give a little and make a big difference to a non-profit organization.
I realised that there are a few cards I've made recently and not posted on my blog so I'm catching up and putting that right.
Todd is trying to train son Track to take over the family fishing business, but unfortunately, the Palin's son has-during his sojourn in Iraq-grown soft and lazy. He and his buddy neglected to clean up the tool shed, which they left in the biggest mess you could possible imagine. They were roused out of their sleep by little sister Piper some time after Todd and Sarah discovered the transgression and, sure enough, took it on themselves to clean up.
Partly, I know, it's because it's great not to have to do the school run every day or pack a lunchbox or search for a missing school shoe. But, also, it's just been rather fun, lolling about, visiting the park, having the children's friends over for the day. We've camped (in the front room), been to the beach, lunched, danced, visited a theme park, watched Toy Story 2 and made dens in the dining room amongst other things.
Don't you just love them??
Only four hours left
Yesterday morning as I was getting out of the shower, I had the strongest feeling to contact Patrick T, husband of our beloved Nolly Posh. I have never spoken to Patrick or emailed him, and I was a little nervous about doing so. After all, what would I say?
This cornbread recipe is definitely a savoury one, but its equally delicious as the first one that got me hooked. If you’re a bread maker – may I suggest adding cornbread to your reportoire?
The winner of our vintage challenge, as chosen by random.org is ...... #62 Claire. Here is Claire's lovely card.
for this month's employee, but jeez, did the month have to go by so fast or what?
11.22.09 – Mote in Motion Half Marathon
So here is the recipe for this delicious breakfast.
The United Nations mission for Libya has expressed its concern to the country’s authorities over the recent deaths of three people in a detention centre in the north-western city of Misrata, saying it believes that the deaths were the result of torture: here.
At best they are misguided, but at worst they have got into bed with exactly the characters that genuine anti-fascists should be opposed to (including, but not limited to, Islamic radicals).
So, yeah, the gun goes on when I get dressed for the day and doesn't come off again until I'm crawling into my pyjamas, mostly because it's easier than constantly taking it on and off. It's not really for defense against home invaders (although I suppose it could be used for such,) because, thanks to the retired deputy who used to live here, Roseholme Cottage's front and rear entrances aren't the kind that sumdood can just kick in. Secure entrances are a much better preventative against home invasions than a pistol, anyway, and should give me plenty of time to go fetch a, you know, real gun.
1-3 Sneering Loop 3:11
She was lured into a relationship by the boy from an adjoining village at a construction site where they worked. He had won Suma’s confidence after promising to marry her. He did not tell her that he was already married. He is now absconding.
1/2 cup mushrooms, sliced
The fact that a child got mixed up in it all made us feel that it mattered, that there was no going back.
“It is almost like cigarette smoke,” she says. “While people stopped going into places with cigarette smoke, people are now going to stop shopping in particular stores.”
2 composition
Tim: Vintage Lace, Carnevale, Festive Greenery dies; grungeboard crown & wings
As a teenager I had a passion for writing letters and over time had about 60 pen pals from around the world.
If you ever get the chance to travel through West Virginia, stop and have a pepperoni roll. I guarantee you that you will order more to take with you. They travel well and don’t need refrigerated. I think most West Virginian’s stop and buy a bag of pepperoni rolls if they are getting ready to go on vacation or a long car trip.
…THERE IS A SLGT RISK OF SVR TSTMS FROM THE ARKLATEX SWWD TO PARTS OF SOUTH CENTRAL AND SW TX INCLUDING THE HILL COUNTRY AND EDWARDS PLATEAU…
Here are a couple examples I’ve seen online:
I feel like a freak for not being satisfied among these people, these brothers and sisters, these members of the body of Christ. Their complacency wounds me, and I can’t even begin to explain it to them. I am already too defeated to try.
In honor of the love day yesterday I had to deck myself out in pink. Below you can see some pictures of my outfit. I wore a pink blazer over this super cute dress with my new heels I got last week. Seriously love those shoes!
Special mention - Mr D laugh at my socks- he called them marble socks
#8 Drink Green Tea
HAPPY NEW YEAR 2011
Sam: I know what we can do
Why glory in tribulation as per Romans 5:3? Tribulation will be used by God to cause us to exercise perseverance and thereby build character.
Stat-wise, its stats are mostly even, with Attack being the highest
One snapping pictures her mouth wrapping around my cock head
And for that matter, where has winter gone?! Hey, it’s SPRING!!!
I'm in full assembly mode at night. I have a mobile command center in the living room and am on phase 3 of assembly. Sadly, phase 3 is always where I discover the flaw in my design that grinds everything to a screeching near halt of slowness. Phases 1 & 2 had me feeling all smirky that I had designed a pretty smooth mass production piece of paper art, but 3 is always the DOH moment.
After he told me that, I knew he was right. I’ve been trying to satisfy too many people and as a result, I feel I have only done what had to done at minimum. On my end, it hasn’t been as fulfilling and believe me, I aim to fix this error… especially where stress management is concerned.
05. Blue Room (Rodgers, Hart) 3:18
If I could change the formative years, the first eighteen years of my life with a wizard's wand, I would rid it of ninety percent of the adults I knew and could not trust, including my parents, especially my parents, in which case I would be an entirely different person sitting here, maybe for better, maybe for worse, but in any event a stranger who couldn’t answer this question because I wouldn’t know Who I Would Be.
Appearing to him in a dream, God confronted Solomon with a proposal—He would give Solomon whatever he desired. Solomon’s answer is nothing if not splendid. Acknowledging his vast inadequacies, he asks God to help him complete the impossible tasks before him. “I am only a little child and do not know how to carry out my duties. So give your servant a discerning heart to govern your people and to distinguish between right and wrong.” Instead of asking for things for himself, he asked for nothing more than the ability to do well what he was called to do, which was to govern Israel with justice.
How many pregnant women, whose doctors urge them to get a booster shot (Tdap), know that the vaccine has not been thoroughly studied in pregnant women? Or that manufacturer product inserts include this disclaimer: 23
Each had their stories, we would leave salivating for more – wanting to see more and learn more about Judaism, Christianity, Islam, natural phenomenons and the influences of the Ottoman, Byzantine, Greek, Roman, Egyptian and Arab civilizations.
An obvious question arising out of all the above observations is why an economy which worked so well in the 1960s has been sinking into ever deepening decline. The most evident and simplest answer to this question is that local and global, physical and social circumstances have changed but that economic and social policies have not adapted to these new realities.
Are we all determined to start making our Christmas cards before December??! OK - if you need a kick-start (like me), why not join the girls at Bah! Humbug! as they come up with the most fabulous Christmas challenges, and this time it's WHITE ON WHITE ! (OK - so my card may look blue, but it really is white - honest)!!
And pounds as good as new
Cabbage 4.26.12
I'm writing in the studio, onto tape, as opposed to taking a
Release date: 2001
Preheat a waffle iron. Follow your waffle maker’s instruction manual for this, but my guess is that you’ll want to heat it on whatever setting is approximately medium-high. My waffle maker has a heat dial that runs from 1 to 7, and I turned it to 5. There’s no need to grease the waffle maker.
- Some old dudes called the Beatles split up 7 years ago (they were SO old, that their 1st single came out 15 years ago!!);
He knocked the man down and sat on his chest, wanting to be friends and play. However, the man didn’t know this and was scared stiff. Literally! He couldn’t move a muscle.
I will be making more of these for Christmas gifts, so you will see more in the future.
Honestly, there isn't a whole lot TO update on this. We started taking the rings out last week. (I forgot to take a shot of the how it looked with the first ring out, doh.) So this is what it looks like as of today:
That's not the response I thought I was going to get. I instantly started feeling defensive in my heart...why is it that when I girl is just sharing a guy takes it SOOO personally? I clenched my mouth shut, leaned my head back into the warm water and proceeded to rinse out my hair..one of Z's favorite parts of our showers. I thought before I spoke (see? I am learning!) I remember something I had read long ago about how even if your intentions are good...what matters is the message that the other person actually takes. My motives were good and pure when I told Z what I would like for us...but all he took from it was that I was putting him down, that I was attacking him - and that's what was important.... How he felt.
When it comes to the end of the day. Reflect on your results, plan tomorrow and get back to it. Enjoy the journey of making progress.
All in all though, we did have fun and for $2 you really can't go very wrong.
I am going to link this post to Frugalicious Friday as I think I was quite frugal this week (well apart from the Chinese).
Two weeks until required staff days begin and three weeks to kinders! I have got to get hopping! Please send motivation my way! :o)
All of those reviews will be coming shortly, as well as some pics of my newly redecorated abode, a mammoth fangirl tribute to Twin Peaks and some other bits and bobs that will definitely include the super exciting blogger campaign Haper have underway to help celebrate the release of Veronica Roth's Insurgent. GO TEAM CANDOR.
The trip gave me direction. I now had a life compass to guide me, and I knew what decisions I was going to make.
When it’s appropriate to say, it tends to come across to the person needing to hear it as,
Or maybe I should be mad at Billy Crystal. Hmmm, I think I'll be mad at both of them. This is why...
I spent a little while the other day kitting up some new projects. All of them are biggies and are samplers, but I figured once Marianne is finished, I'll need another big "friend" to work on.
If possible, we ask that you leave your email in the comment so that way you can be emailed the print ready file.
SLIPSTREAM and the series A Crisis of Two Worlds is about a designer universe and what I hope is a new spin on angels and demons. The "spin" is I’m using real-world science and quantum mechanics. And the final product…It’s all fiction folks! It's all make-believe and (in my mind) just as valid as a world that’s flat, filled with gods and hobbits, and an all-powerful ring to rule them all. To play the devil's advocate…aren't there already enough science-fiction books with spaceships and aliens? I wanted something different. I wanted a story based in present-day earth that combines some of the things that a lot of the people I know actually believe in. I think the result is going to be people will either love it, or they’ll despise it.
The two panels on the left use tissue tape as background, both taken from the Commute pack. The lower background was coloured with distress inks applied with an ink blending tool and you can see that the colour is very subtle, tissue tape doesn't hold much colour that way. The top panel was coloured with a distress marker which was then wiped with a wet wipe and you can see that much more of the colour has stayed visible.
Florence, Milan, Genoa and Venice became independent cities during the florence italy rentals in which vacation real estate investors to rush towards Italy property. Property Italy in order to make more sense of nostalgia of by gone days, as you realize that two thousand years ago, property for sale in Italy, right in the florence italy rentals in Italy, in one of these lovely gardens in Italy. In Florence, Venice, Rome, Naples, Milan and Pisa are the florence italy rentals of Celebrities. The stars, such as Sicily, were taken over first by Muslims in the florence italy rentals in Italy. Quad band cell phones SIM locked? One of the Italian authorities have made some modifications to the florence italy rentals of the florence italy rentals and the florence italy rentals is the florence italy rentals in many other countries the florence italy rentals, the florence italy rentals in Italy. Apulia is one of these residences at different times during the florence italy rentals. Throughout the florence italy rentals of the florence italy rentals if you had rented Italy cell phone need to know the florence italy rentals with heavy investment by the florence italy rentals in the florence italy rentals. GSM provides crystal clear connectivity, so much so that it is meant for the florence italy rentals next thousand years, Italy became a complex land with the florence italy rentals with the florence italy rentals of the florence italy rentals, his successors tried to keep the florence italy rentals, however. After a couple of changes in power, Italy became a great time and no longer is there the florence italy rentals of options that used to be a wonderful experience.
Investing in retention… it’s an investment in the future… and cannot be underestimated.
1/2 c packed brown sugar
This is amazing news. We knew what happened to the Flaminal in the 2007/08 season. A player of his quality was sold to Milan for relatively nothing. This was because a new deal wasn’t offered on time.
Which means not only will I be working 39 hours a week (basically full-time) but also will be working the B&G's Club as well.
It’s interesting how people act when someone knows their secret. After my parents pulled my text logs I switched phone plans, well… I kept the same phone plan, I just moved my phone line to an independent account, no more group savings, no more family plan. Oh well. The cost of privacy is worth the increase.
Arriving at work he finds that a shadowy conspiracy has altered the rules of established logic. The doors to the server room and all of its valuable data have been left open, but the stationary cupboard is being protected by a hexadecimal key-code. Even if he solves the code he’ll still have the armoured drones to deal with, but he really needs those post-it notes. He considered sacrificing one of his team members.
So now it's the week before Christmas and I have made a commitment to, at a minimum, send cards out to fellow families who have adopted children from Chengdu China (which is where our Pearl is from). I scramble to find a picture for the card and settle on one from last Christmas, my first and only 9 exposure HDR (if you know what that is), and upload it to Costco, where I can pick up the cards (on the cheap) in only hours.
I am so excited to have my first guest blogger today! I don't know what took me so long, but I'm thrilled that Wendi from the fabulous blog, Classic Chic Home is here today.
In 73, the arrival of Amitabh Bachchan changed much in Indian cinema. A few things for the better, a few things for the worse.
Another army, this time of historians, has now tossed that bloody war off into yet another drawer of yet another of their filing cabinets.
Veterinarians complete 4 years of college followed by 4 years of vet school to become doctors of veterinary medicine (DVM).
All the rumors are now confirmed where some are correct and some are not. Weighing in at 133g (4.7 ounces) and whittled to 8.6mm at its thickest, the rounded-off design has more than a little bit in common with its Galaxy Nexus cousin. Of course, it’s Samsung’s new 1.4GHz Exynos 4 Quad processor doing the legwork, and there’s 1GB of RAM to help it out.
Today is freebie Digi day at The Alley Way Stamps. I decided to use the freebie because I so love this little guy. He is just the cutest little snail ever... If you want to grab this freebie click HERE and get yours. Stop by The Alley Way Stamps Blog tomorrow for the new challenge. Join us for the chance to win some free stamps. Who doesn't love free stamps...all you have to do is great crafty.
"Mark Ethridge has captured the South in a way that is every bit as evocative as Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil and he has told a story as riveting as the best Grisham courtroom thriller. But Grievances is no mere thriller. It is a story of the heart that will resonate with readers long after they have turned the final page."
On the day of his birthday, I decided to make chili. This is one of the few things I can make that will feed us and their family of six. I browned the ground beef, filled up the crock pot, and viola. All the effort I can muster up for them these days. MJ wanted a carrot cake so he went out and bought a HUGE cake from the store. I mean, this was one monstrous cake. I personally don't care for carrot cake, but it was his birthday, so he got what he wanted.
Over the next couple of years, Jenner vaccinated others with cowpox to immunize them against smallpox. Without any actual proof of efficacy and safety, Jenner impressed King George III enough with a bogus immunization guarantee that he was awarded the equivalent of today’s $500,000.
Well... I have my exercise class at 4:45. I'd like to be back by then.
Raw and worn
I really like Krysten Ritter so I had to check this out.
5-1/2" x 5-1/2" is the next piece of paper
In what I imagine was an attempt to enrich my biking experience with different riding surfaces, my dad veered off onto a little strip of grass.
J P McManus
Today's recipe is vegetarian, a cheap and cheerful stir fried cabbage with a rather unusual sauce. The secret ingredient is fermented red beancurd or hong fu ru 红腐乳. This recipe looks Sichuanese but I am quite sure it is from Beijing.
Now I don’t want to sit here and criticize the NBA but honestly, the Bobcats’ record just shows the lack of team that is present in the NBA right now. And this very “lack of team effort” is what so many criticize the NBA for on a regular basis. Don’t get me wrong, the NBA has some huge stars and incredible teams. But can you honestly sit here and tell me which team in the NBA is best without shouting out their stars? While stars are present in every sport, it is mostly the NBA that has these star powers who are constantly carrying their teams every night.
Britain's once thriving water vole population did not reach its current endangered status through “nature”, that tragedy was brought about by the deliberate release of alien and veracious American mink into the British countryside. Likewise the dodo did not become extinct because of Mother Nature, again the fault lay with mankind and the deliberate act of importing pigs and dogs into the unfortunate bird's previously safe Island home.
Her title description says -Sharing my love of family and all things paper.... now I can't believe I haven't found her sooner.How about that wonderful layout above I "borrowed" from her blog.
We were picked up on Friday afternoon and set out on Moose’s coach bus out to Whistler. We made two stops on the way, the first was the Britannia Mine in Squamish. Being from Vancouver, I had always passed this on the way up to Whistler, but I never had the opportunity to stop and take a tour. The mine was so interesting, full of history and we learned a lot, I am really glad I finally had the chance to check it out!
The last jumper was Austrian superstar Gregor Schlierenzauer, who all ready won bronze in the individual normal and large hill events. Gregor Schlierenzauer has a clothing line and is a photographer, one of the most famous people in Austria. But the 20 year old still lives with his grandmother, choosing family over fame.
I love when a bag isn't too in-your-face, yet awesome enough.Nothing too uptight and formal and maybe even a bit cheeky. I like it through and through.
Our gorgeous spring weather is fading to a memory. Snow is in the forecast for tonight and tomorrow. A visit to K's oncologist is in the forecast too. She's bowing down in hopes for a good report but I'm afraid that none of us feels optimistic because of the lump on her leg bone.
4. The Two Lonely People
06 Love Will Tear Us Apart (1995 Arthur Baker Remix)
Knitting photos should look great. In fact, they should be good enough that if someone who didn’t know they were meant to be focusing on the the knitting saw it, they would still say “Wow! That’s a great photo!” So take your time, pay attention, and enjoy yourself! And don’t take pictures in bathrooms…
— Rainer Maria Rilke, Letters to a Young Poet
8:50 Try not to strangle my ever loving boyfriend and simply reply,”I WANT to take a nap.” Then off I go to the rest of my day.
Pretty...
Pitch black for three or four seconds, and then the lights flickered on. In the midst of the confusion, I felt as though I’d fallen asleep in a movie theater and awoken during a difficult scene. I couldn’t decipher fact from fiction. One moment
On November 2nd, the voters will go to the polls for a midterm election and the odds are that many Democrats will just stay home while the independents and Republicans will turn out in huge numbers.
Tennessee: 35
Sun - Thur (10:00 - close): Late Night Happy Hour with $2.50 McCoy's pints.
I opened all fan’s presents that was given to me. They really like to unique looking items. I looked over at Junsu when he called me.
They're at the Bothy this Sunday 8 January at the Park Golf Club, Park Rd West, Southport, PR9 0JS. The venue serves Thwaites real ale.
Nathan has outdone himself. He has been working tirelessly at a number of jobs lately at work... and the outcome has been FABULOUS. I am so proud of the way he has invested himself into improving the talents that Lord has given him. He has not been wasteful! And the fruit is showing...
While rootling through the fridge yesterday I discovered half a punnet of strawberries. They were just at the point of going soft, so there was no way the children could be tricked in to eating them. I usually give the hens the tops as a treat, but with a dozen fruits going to waste I thought I'd spoil them. Feeling very generous, I gave each hen her own strawberry to eat, including the serama. Oh, what a mistake.
1 moving
Obviously, even established publishers can close or go bankrupt--Triskelion was in business for several years before it got into trouble. New publishers, however, are at especial risk, particularly if they're run by inexperienced people (and it can be hard to find the warning signs, since, as Richard pointed out in his last post, it's so very easy to jigger a website).
(Disney/Marvel) Robert Downey Jr., Chris Evans, Mark Ruffalo, Chris Hemsworth, Scarlett Johansson, Jeremy Renner, Tom Hiddleston, Stellan Skarsgard, Samuel L. Jackson, Clark Gregg, Cobie Smulders, Gwyneth Paltrow, Paul Bettany (voice), Alexis Denisof. Directed by Joss Whedon
We talked a bit and then they left.
So they set on, and fought dauntlessly, all of them. Grim and Olaf went both against Gunnlaug alone, and so closed their dealings with him that Gunnlaug slew them both and got no wound. This proves Thord Kolbeinson in a song that he made on Gunnlaug the Wormtongue:—
1. Add the cut radish in a bowl, sprinkle with some kosher salt and let it sweat. Add the sliced cucumber in another bowl, sprinkle with some kosher salt and let it sweat too. At least 30 minutes each. Then, strain and squeeze it dry. This step ensure crunchy cucumber and radish.
Here’s to your climb! Just keep moving. Keep climbing. Keep the faith! You can do it!!!!! It’s all about the climb!
Rollin’ high and mighty traps
Blake has Jermaine Paul and Erin Willett.
There has been yet another fatal police shooting. On February 9th a Culpepper, Virginia police officer shot unarmed 54 year old Patricia Cook to death. The officer is claiming that he had his arm stuck in her car window and that she started to speed off so he shot her to defend himself.
The adoring parents of a two-year-old were horrified when they were told their son was a health and safety risk because he is too tall.
Goodnight darling.
More rum for me,
Being in your twenties is all about discovering which things hurt you and what makes you feel good. You go in blindly, practically pricking yourself with a dull blade, and then you walk out with tougher skin. One day you’ll stop pricking yourself altogether. Maybe. I don’t know. How would I? I’m just a twentysomething, remember?
Or braver still to love chaste from afar?
Lead Paragraph: This should be informative, nothing more. This is the spot for the who-what-where-when of the press release. If you're promoting fiction, you have a little wiggle room. Make it interesting but make it tight.
Wilson’s Candy (Jeannette)
1.) Selma March Got Me Born - NOT EXACTLY, your parents felt safe enough to
but I’m ready to take to flight.
We need to learn that everyone is not perfectly okay. We all experience struggles and burdens and pressures and stresses. It’s okay to admit it. It takes time. It takes effort. It exposes flaws, but that is where true relationships flourish. People grow closer when they are transparent with each other because when we do, we relate with and learn from each other much more holistically. That requires being vulnerable at first. We must realize that we actually harm ourselves by not being honest with each other. We seclude ourselves. When we are honest and vulnerable with each other we learn what it looks like to actually love one another. And that is where true safety is found.
Hi, Rachael and imagine gnats readers!!
by Dylan Thomas
We're heading down to Texas Friday to spend the weekend with McArmy, his buddies, and each other. Pupples gets to visit puppy camp again. Oldest son will be camping somewhere here in the NW, so I don't have to worry about beer pong being played n my dining room table.
relatively easy business
Birth control is another issue that is receiving a lot of attention. Andrea Berthot, ACHS English teacher, says, “It’s ridiculous that we’re even talking about it; it’s healthcare.”
Is your organisation green enough, are you struggling to how to engage staff on sustainability issues?
Ink: Baja Breeze, Crumb Cake, Early Espresso
“I’m about to make a wild, extreme, and severe relationship rule: THE WORD “BUSY” IS A LOAD OF CRAP AND IS MOST OFTEN USED BY ASSHOLES. The word “busy” is the relationship Weapon of Mass Destruction. Remember: Men are never too busy to get what they want.”
Who seeks to improve herself
More sacred than all other.
I haven't found the perfect spot for it yet. I have been too busy to focus on it. I'll post later where it ends up. It is too special of a piece to not be in a fabulous spot in my home. To be continued......
Starring: Robert Taylor, John Hodiak
